

QVT Fund LP: Private Company Information - Bloomberg










































  





















































































July 28, 2017 7:19 AM ET
Capital Markets

Company Overview of QVT Fund LP



Snapshot People




Company Overview
QVT Fund LP is a fund managed by QVT Financial LP.


1177 Avenue of the Americas9th FloorNew York, NY 10036United States



Phone: 212-705-8888








Key Executives for QVT Fund LP




Mr. Lars E. Bader


      	Managing Member
      








Mr. Nicholas Brumm


      	Managing Member
      


Age: 49
        







Ms. Tracy Fu


      	Managing Member
      








Mr. Daniel A. Gold


      	Managing Partner, Founder, and Chief Executive Officer
      


Age: 49
        




Compensation as of Fiscal Year 2017. 



Similar Private Companies By Industry



Company Name
Region



 @Visory LLC United States 1 Road Partners LLC United States 11T Partners, LLC United States 123Jump.com, Inc. United States 1509225 Ontario, Inc. United States




Recent Private Companies Transactions



TypeDate
Target



No transactions available in the past 12 months.




Request Profile Update

















 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



Most Searched Private Companies



Company Name
Geographic Region



 Lawyers Committee for Civil Rights Under Law United States NYC2012, Inc. United States The Advertising Council, Inc. United States Bertelsmann AG Europe Rush University United States













Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact QVT Fund LP, please visit --.  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close




























Bizapedia.com - Human Validation
















COMPANIESPEOPLEPRODUCTS/SERVICESTRADEMARKSADDRESSESPHONE BOOK




            Our system has detected a high number of page requests from your IP Address, please prove to us that you are a human to continue using our website.
        
























                            Please send me to the search subscription offer page after I successfully answer the word challenge.
                        









BIZAPEDIAPRO SEARCHPerform unlimited searches via ouradvanced search form withBizapedia Pro Search.FIND OUT MORE >BIZAPEDIAPRO DATABuild custom data listsfor one or many stateswith Bizapedia Pro Data.FIND OUT MORE >


Copyright © 2012-2017 · Bizapedia.com · All rights reserved.BlogPro SearchPro APIContact UsTerms of UsePrivacy PolicySitemapDesktop Version
















QVT Home











Take a few moments to learn about who we are, what we do, and what we expect of you. If youâre interested, and you think we would be, too, bring yourself to our attention. 









 







QVT - Contact






 




 

Campus Hires
Exceptional undergraduate or graduate school candidates are encouraged to submit their resumes to campus@qvt.com.       	  
If you feel that additional materials are necessary, please remember this lesser-known maxim of Pythagoras:
"Do not say a little in many words, but a great deal in few."			
 
Experienced Hires
Candidates with professional experience are welcome to submit their resumes to recruiting@qvt.com. 
We look forward to hearing from you.



 







QVT - Approach













QVT originated   as a non-traditional proprietary trading group inside an investment bank and currently has approximately $2 billion under management. Our core team has spent over 10 years working together to develop and implement innovative, fundamental and quantitatively-oriented trading strategies, many of which make extensive use of internally-developed, proprietary software.

The staffing philosophy at QVT is to employ a select number of exceptionally high-caliber individuals who can apply original thinking to a wide range of investment opportunities, across sectors and around the world. In contrast to many financial firms, we provide a work environment that encourages balance between professional and personal lives.



 






Video of QVT Fund v. Eurohypo - Hearing - 03/29/11 to 03/29/11 - Courtroom View Network



















Home
Cases
Industries
Practice Areas
States
Search
Pricing
Contact
Login


CVN



QVT Fund v. EurohypoCONCLUDEDHearing03/29/11 – 03/29/11 Subscribe  Purchase DVDSummaryIn this financial services litigation hearing on motion to stay discovery and dismiss, defendant Eurohypo Capital Funding LLCs counsels argued that the lawsuit brought against the bank by the plaintiff QVT Fund LP must be dismissed because a similar proceeding was also ongoing against the defendant in Germany. In the lawsuit, QVT Fund LP alleged that the defendant which is a subsidiary of Germanys Commerzbank Group, didnt paid the plaintiff for the investment made by the plaintiff in profit dependent securities which the defendant had used to raise capital thereby violating contractual obligation.The plaintiff was represented by attorney Robert Juman. The defendant was represented by attorney Amanda Gallager.Case InformationAttorneysWitnessesPlaintiffQVT Fund LPDefenseEurohypo Capital Funding LLCJudgeDonald ParsonsJurisdictionDelaware Court Of ChanceryCourtNew Castle County CourthouseCase Number5881-VCPIndustryFinancePractice AreaCommercial Law, Financial Services, SecuritiesPlaintiffQVT Fund LPRepresented By:Juman, Robert (Quinn Emanuel Urquhart Oliver & Hedges, LLP)DefenseEurohypo Capital Funding LLCRepresented By:Gallager, Amanda (Linklaters LLP )Expert WitnessesLay WitnessesSessionsAttorneyGallager, Amanda
Juman, RobertWitnessTypeOtherDescriptionClosing Statement
End of Session
General Case Activities
Opening StatementPM SessionOther9 ChaptersDescriptionAttorneyWitnessPresence00:00:00General Case Activities00:00:16Opening StatementGallager, Amanda00:23:05Opening StatementJuman, Robert00:28:18General Case Activities00:33:10Opening StatementJuman, Robert00:54:20Closing StatementGallager, Amanda01:20:05Closing StatementJuman, Robert01:24:41General Case Activities01:31:57End of SessionMAR29Recording Disclaimer: This proceeding was recorded in full.
Courtroom View NetworkWant to stay updated? Join our newsletter!



×

 



Suggest a TrialWant to see a trial that you don't see in our list of upcoming trials?Suggest a CaseTraining LibrariesVideo of proceedings professionally tailored for your training and developmentTraining LibrariesVideo LibraryUnlimited access to thousands of hours of past coverage of high stakes civil litigationVideo LibraryLinksAbout CVNCourtroom ConnectLexisNexis Courtroom CastRemote CounselFollow UsContact Us3901 Roswell RoadSuite 302Marietta, GA 30062877-838-9067Copyright 2017 Courtroom Connect.Privacy Policy | Terms and Conditions










	QVT Fund V LP et al v. China Zenix Auto International Ltd. et al: Claim Form































Daily news, documents and intelligence about Offshore Financial Centers and those who conduct business in them that you will not find anywhere else.



Resend email
Change email address






Sign In
Welcome back to OffshoreAlert. Please enter your email address and password to sign in. 



Email Address or Username

Invalid email.


Password

Invalid password.





Keep me signed in 

Forgot password? Click here to reset it. 




                Don't have an account? Subscribe for unlimited access.
 Register to join the community for free.












HOME  
|  PROFILE   
|  ACCOUNT   
|  REGISTER   
|  WORKAREA  
|  SIGN INSIGN OUT                             
                    














ALL NEWSARTICLES & DOCUMENTS






News 


Latest Articles
Featured News
Most Read
Most Commented
Most Rated



Documents

Latest Documents


Regulatory Actions
From the Courts
MLATs


Liquidations & Insolvencies
Extraditions
Litigation



Content sorted by:

Jurisdiction
Bahamas
Bermuda
British Virgin Islands
Cayman Islands
Canada
United Kingdom
USA
> View All


Sector
Securities & Investment
Banks & Trust
Litigation
Tax
> View All


Crime
Fraud
Money Laundering
Bribery & Corruption
Narcotics Trafficking
> View All










RESEARCHTOOLS & RESOURCES






Tools

Search OffshoreAlert
Email Alerts
Select topics of interest and when we publish content related to those topics we will notify you immediately by email.



Resources

Offshore Courts
Bermuda Courts
BVI Courts
Cayman Courts


OffshoreAlert Forums
Due Diligence Forums
Other financial crime message boards.


Information Exchange
Post and Request Information About Individuals and Businesses 


Help Me Recover My Assets
I'm at my wit's end. Can you help?

Consumer Alerts
Sites that alert consumers about potential scams.

Ask Offshore Alert



Find information by

Jurisdiction
Bahamas
Bermuda
British Virgin Islands
Cayman Islands
Canada
United Kingdom
USA
> View All


Sector
Securities & Investment
Banks & Trust
Litigation
Tax
> View All


Crime
Fraud
Money Laundering
Bribery & Corruption
Narcotics Trafficking
> View All











CONFERENCESOFFSHOREALERT NETWORKING EVENTS







Financial Intelligence & Investigations Events

Join clients, providers and investigators of high-end financial products
and services from UK, Europe, USA, Canada and key offshore jurisdictions
to network and discuss wealth creation, preservation and recovery.

UPCOMING CONFERENCES

 
MIAMI BEACH | APRIL 30 - MAY 2, 2017
                                        15th Annual North American OffshoreAlert Conference
The Ritz-Carlton, South Beach, Miami Beach, Florida 



 
LONDON 2017 | DATES TBD 
                                       6th Annual European OffshoreAlert Conference
Grange St. Paul’s Hotel, London, United Kingdom







EVENT NEWS

China-Jailed Corporate PI To Speak At OffshoreAlert London ConferenceFirst Tier Tickets Almost Sold OutOffshoreAlert London Conference: Tickets Now Available









OPINIONBLOGS & LETTERS TO THE EDITOR






Letters

View Recent Letters
We want to hear from you, share your experience, insight, or opinion. We'll share it with the Of our broase of subscribers.
Submit Letter 



Blogs

Latest Blog Posts

Editor's Blog
OffshoreAlert Owner & Editor David Marchant on issues affecting international finance




Fraud and Asset Recovery
 Legal & practical issues in detecting & investigating fraud & recovering assets

Offshore Finance
Offshore stakeholders discuss products, services & issues affecting the industry




Whistleblowing
The ins-and-outs of a potentially lucrative but career-ending industry











COMMUNITYASK QUESTIONS & CONTRIBUTE






Forums

FRAUD, SCAMS and UNETHICAL BEHAVIOR
Information Exchange
Post and Request Information About Individuals and Businesses

Rants and Raves
Sound Off About Anything You Want

ASSET RECOVERY
Help Me Recover My Assets 
I'm at my wit's end. Can you help? 



MONEY LAUNDERING
Compliance Exchange
Ask questions and share information about compliance topics and issues.

USEFUL LINKS
News
Links to outside news articles

Due Diligence Forums
Other financial crime message boards. 



ARCHIVES
Old Message Board
Legacy forum from prior OffshoreAlert website.

GENERAL
About this Forum
Terms of Use.

Announcements
The latest from OffshoreAlert

Comments about OffshoreAlert
The Good, the Bad and the Ugly. 




Forum Index
Search Forums
Control Panel











SUBSCRIBEREDUCE RISK & EVALUATE OPPORTUNITY 



CONFERENCELONDON, UK 26 - 27 NOVEMBER 2012






News 


Latest Articles
Featured News
Most Read
Most Commented
Most Rated



Documents

Latest Documents


Regulatory Actions
From the Courts
MLATs


Liquidations & Insolvencies
Extraditions
Litigation



Content sorted by:

Jurisdiction
Bahamas
Bermuda
British Virgin Islands
Cayman Islands
Canada
United Kingdom
USA
> View All


Sector
Securities & Investment
Banks & Trust
Litigation
Tax
> View All


Crime
Fraud
Money Laundering
Bribery & Corruption
Narcotics Trafficking
> View All


















NEWS

Home / Documents / BVI High Court / Commercial / Writs












QVT Fund V LP et al v. China Zenix Auto International Ltd. et al: Claim Form
                                     
                
            Claim Form in QVT Fund V LP, QVT Fund IV LP, and Quintessence Fund L.P. v. China Zenix Auto International Limited, RichWise International Investment Group Limited, and Jianhui Lai at the British Virgin Islands High Court.
                
            



DOCUMENT.PDFFile Size: 76.75 KBDownload Now  



Pages:xx Plaintiff(s):Xxxxxxxxxxx Xxxxxxxxxxx Date:xxx / xx / xxxx


Sector:Xxxxxxxxxxxxx Defendant(s):Xxxxxxxxxxx Xxxxxxxxxxx Case Number:Xx Xx Xx






For security purposes please verify your download.





Please Wait... 0%


                   Oops. Your browser does not support iframes.                   
                







Invalid email.




Invalid password.







Keep me signed in


Forgot Password?



 




Unlimited Access to the Largest Offshore Database
For Less Than $3 per Day



$90
per Month
Unlimited Access







Subscribe to OffshoreAlert
Investigative Financial Documents
Learn who to avoid and connect the dots via documents about Offshore Financial Centers, cross-border financial crime and complex financial disputes that are not available elsewhere on the Internet.

One-Click International Financial Due Diligence at an Affordable Price
Over 1,300 Requests for Judicial Assistance by the World's Major Countries
Court listings from Bermuda, BVI and Cayman
Criminal Indictments, Civil Complaints & Dubious Promotional Material





































KEYWORDSIntertrust Corporate Services (Cayman) Ltd.


TOPICSLitigationPublic CompaniesSecurities & InvestmentBritish Virgin IslandsCayman IslandsChinaUSA[ 4 more... ]



EMAIL ALERTS  


                        Sign-Up for eMail Alerts by Topic or Keyword
                    












NOT YET RATED  











Please enter a comment to post



Comment



Reply





OffshoreAlert encourages lively, open debate and asks that you refrain from profanity, hate speech, personal comments and remarks that are off point.  Thank you for taking the time to offer your thoughts. 
POST A COMMENTYou must be logged in to rate and comment.















OffshoreConnect Free Sign Up




Stay informed & connected


Free Email Alerts on Breaking News
Free Access to Blogs by Industry Leaders
Free Contribute to Due Diligence Forums














MOST READ
MOST RATED
MOST COMMENTED





1EXPOSED: Belvedere Management's massive criminal enterprise2BUSTED: British & Irish expats who help Belvedere Group swindle investors3Head of Cayman fund group Tim Schools accused of professional misconduct in UK


1A Message to Investors of Axiom Legal Financing Fund2Fraudster Tim Schools turns to a reprobate's best friend - British libel law3The Michael Alberga problem: What is Cayman going to do about him?


1 Whistleblowing: Good Practice - Advice - Support - Guidance2 Robert Farrell et al v. Princeton Alternative Funding, LLC et al: First Amended Complaint3 Aldo Gianne v. Lee Webb: Writ of Summons


SEE MORE  







NEWS  




ALL FEATURED  
Traded Life Policies Fund is latest Jeremy Leach investment scheme to collapse

A Cayman Islands fund - Traded Life Policies Fund - has become the latest investment scheme operated by Marbella-based, British fund manager Jeremy Leach to collapse in dubious circumstances.

LATEST NEWS  

Companies House starts 'Compulsory Strike Off' action against Privilege Wealth PlcRussian oligarch's BVI firm sues registered agent that provided information to tax authorityFlorida resident receives 57 months in prison for offshore bank and tax fraudCrithfield & Donaldson found guilty in offshore tax fraud schemeAuditor BDO sued for $280M by liquidators of 'defrauded' Cayman fundCayman's 'Margaritaville Beach Resort' manager sued by construction firmBermuda and Curacao funds used to launder $125M fraud proceeds, say policeOffshoreAlert target Eligere Investments files for liquidation









 MLATS





Argentina: Federico Garcia Aparicio Switzerland: Tropical Fruit...Switzerland: Jeffery CrooneyChile: Jose Miguel Lira LopezMontenegro: Eduard Shirokov et al


SEE MORE  








 OFFSHORE COURTS




BERMUDA  

 David Dumont v. Bermuda College:...Regina Ltd.: Restoration Petition David Joll v. Graphitene... Notz, Stucki Management (Bermuda)...Priosma Ltd.: Restoration Petition

BRITISH VIRGIN ISLANDS  

 Beacon Events Ltd. v. Aspermont... Yeo Boon Ann et al v. City Legend... Theodoulos Antoniou v. Prefield... Ralf-Dieter Montag-Girmes et al v.... MTH Ltd. v. Trinity World...

CAYMAN ISLANDS  

 Windsor Castle Capital Group v.... Beacon Realty Ltd.: Restoration... ICICI Bank Ltd. v. Essar Global... Sellten Polska sp. z o.o. v. Hugh... Princess Fahdah Husain Al-Athel v....








OA BLOGS  





Victims of Fraud: OffshoreAlert wants to hear from you
David Marchant


            OffshoreAlert wants to hear from victims of high value fraud who are seeking litigation funding so they can try to recover assets from those who swindled them and their enablers.The reason  At The OffshoreAlert Europe Conference in London on






FORUMS MOST RECENT 





 Uncovering Offshore Financial... Madoff Trustee Reaches Recovery... Saudi fraud trial ends this week... Cayman politician McKeeva bush... Keswick fraudster Cullen Johnson... Latvian Bank Fined Heavily Over... Bank Leumi: Germany's Moral... UK tax evasion investigations... Bancroft Life: Lottery rigging... BVI: New beneficial ownership...





















Credible & Independent
Since 1997, OffshoreAlert has gone toe-to-toe with financial miscreants. Some have made death threats and more have tried to sue us out of existence. All have failed. We're strong, independent and good at what we do.
About Us  


Sections


Articles
Documents
Blogs
Letters
Forums
Events




Support


Contact Us
FAQs
Terms of Service
Privacy Policy



Follow Us


LinkedIn
Twitter
Facebook

Google+





Join Now


Subscribe
The Best Offshore Reporting for $3/day
Register
Stay Informed & Connected











Copyright ©  1997-2012 OffshoreAlert ®. All rights reserved. 











To view this notification widget you need to have JavaScript enabled. This notification widget was easily created with NotifySnack.







 QVT Fund V LP et al v China Zenix Auto International Group Limited et al                       clear all filters      {{term.terms}}      Minimize Search Window                {{item.title}}  Filter By Category {{SelectedFilters.length}}x Categories         Judgments    Court of Appeal     High Court     Digest of Decs..    Sittings    Jobs               {{item.title}}  {{selectedCountries.length}}x Countries   Country       Anguilla Antigua Grenada Dominica Montserrat Saint Kitts Saint Lucia Saint Vincent T.V.I                {{item.title}}  Filter By Year  {{selectedOptions.length}}x Options     2017 2016 2015 2014 2013 2012 2011 2010 2009 2008 2007 2006 2005 2004 2003 2002 2001 2000 1999 1998 1997 1996 1995         Sorry can't find what you're looking for try adjusting your search terms           {{doc._source.post_title}}                      Page {{indexVM.page}}  of {{indexVM.pageCount}}               pdf Text  Home » Judgments » High Court Judgments » QVT Fund V LP et al v China Zenix Auto International Group Limited et al             EASTERN CARIBBEAN SUPREME COURTTERRITORY OF THE VIRGIN ISLANDSCOMMERCIAL DIVISION IN THE HIGH COURT OF JUSTICE CLAIM NO. BVIHC (COM) 26 of 2014  IN THE MATTER OF SECTION 184B OF THE BVI BUSINESS COMPANIES ACT 2004  AND IN THE MATTER OF CHINA ZENIX AUTO INTERNATIONAL LIMITED  BETWEEN: (1) QVT FUND V LP(2) QVT FUND IV LP(3) QUINTESSENCE FUND LPClaimants-and- (1)  CHINA ZENIX AUTO INTERNATIONAL GROUP LIMITED(2)  RICHWISE INTERNATIONAL INVESTMENT GROUP LIMITED(3)  JIANHUI LAI(4)  RICHBURG HOLDINGS LIMITEDDefendants Appearances: Mr Alexander Heylin and Mr Timothy de Swardt of Kobre & Kim (BVI) LP for the 2nd to 4th DefendantsMr Jonathan Addo and Ms Tamara Maduro of Harney Westwood & Riegels for the Claimants……………………………..2016: November 9December 2.……………………………..JUDGMENT  Introduction [1]  Davis-White QC J (Ag): This case arises out of a failure by the 2nd to 4th Defendants (” Defs2/4“) to serve witness statements in time in accordance with the timetable laid down by a court order as extended by agreement. There are no less than three separate applications. The first in time is a Notice of Application dated 14 September 2016 by Defs 2/4 seeking relief from sanctions and an extension of time in which to serve the relevant witness statements (the ” 1st Application“). The last in time is a Notice of Application dated 3 November 2016 seeking leave to amend the Notice of Application dated 14 September 2016, by altering the period to which time is sought to be extended (the “3rd Application “). The intermediate Notice of Application is dated 10 October 2016 and is a Notice of Application by the Claimants seeking an application that the Defence of Defs2/4 be struck out for the failure to serve witness statements, or, in the alternative, that it be struck out unless witness statements are filed and served by 4pm on 13 October 2016 (the ” 2nd Application“). Witness statements were filed at 4:26pm on 7 October 2016 and exchanged on 14 October 2016.[2]  The chronology is as set out below:DateEvent21.01.16Case management conference: Witness statements ordered to be exchanged on 02.06.1626.05.16Agreed extension to 14.06.16 (at request of Defs 2/4)27.05.16Listing confirmation: 6 day trial for week commencing 20.02.1720.06.16Agreed extension by Court Order to 30.08.16 (at request of 1st Defendant (“Def 1”)).12.07.16Consent Order: signed witness statements to be exchanged by 4:30pm 30.08.1616.08.16By letter Maples & Calder terminate engagement from today’s date. Imperative you take immediate steps to engage new BVI legal reps not least because of witness statement deadline of 30.08.1618.08.16Defs2/4 solicitors (Maples & Calder) apply to come off record26.08.16Extension to 02.09.16 sought by Claimants30.08.16Def1 agree extension;Sols for Defs2/4 (Maples & Calder) inform parties they no longer act and cannot take instructions but have passed request on02.09.16Def1 ask for short extension until next week but ask in light of fact Kobre & Kim to replace Maples & Calder whether sensible to postpone exchange to see the position.08.09.16Def1 ask further extension until 14.09.1609.09.16Claimants agree extension to 14.09.16 for Def1 onlyExpiry of time limit for service Defs2/4 witness statements12.09.16Kobre & Kim write to Harneys (lawyers for claimants) seeking agreement for 21 day extension. Claimant refuses.13.09.16Kobre & Kim engaged by Defs2/414.09.16Def 2/4 new solicitors Kobre & Kim give notice of actingClaimants and Def1 exchange witness statements 1st Application issued: extension of time and relief from sanctions. Listed 09.11.1630.09.16Affidavit pp Claimants on 1st application (K Crabbe-Adams)07.10.1616:27: Defs2/4 Witness statements filed18:15: Email Kobre & Kim to Harneys & Conyers : confirm filing and ready to mutually exchange. Suggest early next week.11.10.1609:40 Harneys file 2nd Application (dated 10.10.16)16:15 Harneys serve Kobre & Kim with 2nd Application, notice of hearing 2pm following day The relevant procedural law and the facts regarding extensions of time  [3]  The relevant procedural law is not in dispute.[4]  The dates for service of the witness statements set by the Court’s order of 12 July 2016 or, if no such order was made (I have only seen a draft consent order signed by the parties), then the original order of 21 January 2016, were capable of being altered by agreement between the parties provided that that would not necessitate any key dates being altered (EC CPR 27.8(2)). Whether by order or agreement it is clear that the date for exchange of witness statements (“Exchange”) was extended until 30 August 2016.[5]  The circumstances in which extensions of time for Exchange after 30 August 2016 came about are unclear. Given Maples & Calder’s (” M&C‘s) ceasing to play any active role (there was a gap between that position and their formal removal from the record), it appears that the extension of the time to Exchange to 2 September 2016, sought by the Claimants, was only agreed to by the solicitors for Def1, Conyers Dill & Pearman (“Conyers“).[6]  The extension for Exchange sought by the solicitors for Def1 on 2 September, to 9 September, again does not seem to have been agreed by Defs2/4. It was apparently agreed to by the Claimants but there is no written record in evidence of how and when this was agreed. The evidence for the Claimants (Affidavit of Ms Kimberley Crabbe Adams made on 30 September paragraph 8) misleadingly suggests that the request on 2 September also contained a “further” request for the Claimant’s consent to postpone the exchange of all witness statements as it had come to the attention of Def1 that Kobre & Kim were to be engaged for Defs2/4 in place of M&C. In fact, the relevant e-mail sought an extension “until next week” to enable the finalisation of a specific witness statement, the maker being then travelling. The letter then went on to ask, in the light of the anticipated appointment of Kobre & Kim “whether it might be sensible to postpone exchange of all statements until the end of next week so as to enable the parties to determine whether exchange can take place simultaneously?” This is hardly the “further” request described by Ms Crabbe Adams.[7]  The emails between Conyers and Harney Westwood & Riegels (” Harneys“) show that Harneys agreed to a further extension until 14 September for Exchange as between the Claimants and Def1 but not as between the Claimants and Defs2/4. However, it is wholly unclear from the evidence whether such information was relayed to Defs2/4 by Harneys and if so how.[8]  Although the matter is not before me there appears therefore to be a serious question as to whether not only Defs2/4 but also the Claimants were in breach of the relevant time for Exchange as set by Court order (to the extent it was validly and in fact extended by agreement). I do not know whether, and of so when, the Claimants followed the sealed envelope procedure for filing their evidence as provided for by EC CPR 29.7 to avoid themselves being in breach.[9]  It is also worrying that it is unclear as to which date the last extension was granted to. In their Skeleton Argument the Claimants confidently assert that the agreed extension for Exchange as between Defendants 2/4 and the Claimant was only until 9 September. That this was the intention of Harneys seems to be borne out by the emails between Harneys and Conyers. However, even on this point the evidence of Ms Kimberley Crabbe-Adams is ambivalent: (see paragraph 18 of her 2 nd affidavit made on 10 October 2016): ”  the deadline by which the Respondents should have exchanged their witness statements was 9 September 2016 at best and 14 September at worst  .” The 9 September deadline, she says, was one that Defs2/4 were aware of as is shown by Mr Arthur’s evidence sworn in support of the 1st Application. However, that affidavit in fact mirrors the doubt implicit in Ms Crabbe-Adams’ affidavit as he says that he knew the deadline was extended until 9 September but was not sure whether, as regards the Claimants/Defs2/4, it was extended to 14 September (see paragraph 7 of his Affidavit made on 14 September 2016). I am satisfied on balance that Harneys did not intend or purport to extend the time for Exchange as between them and Defs2/4 to 14 September. However, it is far from clear to me that Defs2/4 had agreed to extend the time for Exchange to 9 September. Again, this is because it is far from clear there was any communication by or on behalf of Defs2/4 to Harneys or the Claimants after the agreed extension to 30 August 2016.[10]  For the purposes of the hearing before me, the Claimants accepted, and indeed asserted, that the time for Exchange between the Claimant and Defs2/4 had been extended to 9 September and I proceed on that basis. Leaving aside the position of the Claimant, it follows that there was a failure by Defs2/4 to Exchange within the time provided for by the Court (as extended by agreement between the parties).[11]  In the case of service of witness statements the EC CPR lays down the well-known sanction that if a witness statement is not served in respect of an intended witness within the time specified by the court, the witness may not be called unless the court permits (EC CPR 29.11(1)). Thus, the rule imposes a sanction.[12]  An applicant for an order varying the time within which something must be done should, generally, apply prior to expiry of the relevant period (EC CPR 27.8(3)) but the Court can extend time even if the application is made after the time for compliance is passed (EC CPR26.1(2)(k)). If a party applies to vary a date after it has passed then the party must apply for (a) an extension of time and (b) relief from any sanction to which the party has become subject under the Rules or any court order (EC CPR 27.8(4)).[13]  Relief from sanctions is provided for by EC CPR 26.8. The application must be made promptly (EC CPR 26.8(1)(a)). The Court may grant relief only if it is satisfied (EC CPR 26.8(2)) “that:(a)  the failure to comply was not intentional;(b)  there is a good explanation for the failure; and(c)  the party in default has generally complied with all other relevant rules, practice directions, orders and directions  “[14] ] If each of those conditions are met then, in considering whether to grant relief, the Court must have regard to (EC CPR 26.8(3):(a)   the granting of relief or not would have on each party;(b)  The interests of the administration of justice;(c)   Whether the failure to comply has been or can be remedied within a reasonable time; (d)   Whether the failure to comply was due to the party’s legal practitioner; and (e)  Whether the trial date or any likely trial date can still be met if relief is granted  .”[15]  I was referred to a number of relevant authorities. I have these well in mind. In Ferdinand Frampton v Ian Picard  [1]  Barrow J.A. at paragraph [14] stressed the need to apply the EC CPR in connection with applications for extension of time, and that the court cannot simply overlook the rules because it thinks it fair or reasonable or appropriate or just to do so in a particular case. In   Dominica Agricultural and Industrial Development Bank v Mavis Williams    [2]   ,  the Court stressed the new approach and shift in litigation culture heralded by the CPR and the need to follow the specific CPR rule and to recognise that the framework of decision making under the EC CPR is different to that of the English CPR. In Prudence Robinson v Sagicor General Insurance Inc  .  [3]    the Court of Appeal stressed the need for the court dealing with an application for relief from sanctions and to extend the time for filing and exchanging witness statements or witness summaries, to satisfy itself that there was a good explanation for the delay and that bald assertions without adequate evidence were not good enough. Further, the need to consider each of the factors set out in EC CPR 26.8(3) was stressed. They are not to be applied on a broad brush approach or as being largely dependent on being able to deal with outstanding applications and setting down the matter for trial.[16]  There was however a marked difference between the parties as to the manner in which I should apply the EC CPR provisions. Much of the Skeleton argument of Defs2/4 was taken up with an analysis of the English position and the well-known case of Denton v TH White Ltd  [4]  . Although the respective rules and litigation cultures of the English courts and the BVI courts share a common desire to encourage compliance with the Rules and for the same sort of underlying reasons the manner in which a solution has been sought to the perceived underlying problem has been different in each jurisdiction. There is therefore very limited assistance that one can get from the analytical approach to the different English rules which the English courts have taken when applying the EC CPR. The latter have their own very different structure on this topic. I accept however that there may be some assistance in looking at specific factors to the extent that they are common to the two regimes, however even here care has to be taken because the manner in which a particular factor is interpreted and applied can differ depending on the significance of its role within the relevant analytical framework. Anticipating a point raised by Mr Addo and dealt with below, what suffices as a “good explanation” when it is a minimum requirement before the Court can go onto consider other factors, may not require the same standard of explanation as is required for a “good reason” in the English context, which is simply one among a number of factors that have to be balanced by the Court.Technical points taken by the Claimants [17]  The first point taken by the Claimants, on their own skeleton described as being “highly technical” is that the 1st Application Notice is defective because in seeking an extension of time it refers to “the wrong provision”, EC CPR r26. I do not really understand this point. The application for an extension is made under EC CPR r.26 (see r26.1(2)(k)), further EC CPR r26.8 deals with applications concerning relief from sanctions. In any event, the substance of what is being asked for is perfectly clear and even if the reference to the Rule number were to be wrong, no-one has been or could be misled for an iota of a second as to what the application is seeking. It is this sort of “highly technical point” which the whole culture of the EC CPR is supposed to do away with. It is one without legal, or indeed any other, merit. It is unfortunate that it was ever raised.[18]  The next point taken by the Claimants, is that the Defs2/4 failed to file and serve their witness statements prior to the time to which an extension was sought in their 1st Application Notice (4pm on 7 October). Accordingly, it is said, the application is defective. The evidence was filed on 7 October shortly before 4:30pm and not exchanged until 14 October 2016. The asserted reason why the application is defective is said to be that Defs2/4 thereby “failed to comply with their own deadline and were required prior to 4pm on 7 October to obtain by consent a further extension of time or failing that obtain an extension from the court”. In other words, there was a second failure to meet a relevant deadline. However, this reflects a complete misapprehension as to the legal position. The time for Exchange was not extended by the making of an application seeking its extension to 4pm on 7 October. There was no “further default” when the 4pm 7 October point was passed. The most that can be said is that the Notice of Application would formally need to be amended but, in the circumstances the Court would normally not bother to insist upon this formal technicality and, even if it did, would accede to an oral application at the hearing before it. As it happens the 3 rd Application Notice seeks an order precisely to do that (though it itself may be defective in that it deals only with the filing of the Witness Statements and does not address the late Exchange). For the avoidance of doubt, I formally treat the application before me as being to extend time for Exchange to close of business on 14 October 2016 and formally dispense with any requirement to amend the Notice of Application. Contrary to the submission of the Claimants in their Skeleton argument, the 1st Application is not “a nullity” and no further application for relief and to extend time is necessary. Again, this technically wrong point, does nothing to further the overriding objective. The suggestion that the Court should “draw its own conclusions” from the alleged failure can only be directed at suggesting (as the Claimants’ skeleton argument later asserts) that Defs2/4 are persistently in non-compliance with the rules and have a casual disregard for the court’s processes. This is not an inference that can be drawn from the fact that no further application to extend time and for relief from sanctions was launched.[19]  The next point taken by the Claimants was that evidence on the 1 st Application was served late. In the light of the Claimants’ own behaviour in relation to the 2nd Application (which I deal with below) this submission is, at the least, somewhat surprising. The key question was whether the Claimants were or were not seeking for the evidence to be excluded or for an adjournment. It was confirmed to me, very sensibly if I may say so, that all parties were content to continue with the hearing on the basis of all the evidence filed. The argument that the evidence for Defs2/4 should have been served with the application was based upon EC CPR 69B.5(6). That rule does however permit evidence to be served as soon as reasonably practicable where circumstances do not permit it to be filed and served with the application. Given the circumstances in which the application was launched so soon after Kobre & Kim were instructed and came on the record and given the location of the makers of written evidence (the People’s Republic of China) and language considerations (the “late” written evidence was made in Simplified Chinese and then translated in Hong Kong) I am prepared to assume that circumstances did not permit the evidence to be available at the time of issue. It was suggested that the evidence was provided outside the time allowed by the rules by deduction from EC CPR 69B.5(10). That rule lays down a timetable for evidence in answer and reply and to enable the timetable to operate; the Claimants submitted that one can work back from the hearing date and that fixes a final date for service which overrides the general rule of “as soon as reasonably practicable” in EC CPR 69B 5(6). Again, I decry this sort of rigid highly technical approach to the CPR. In my view EC CPR 69B.5(10) does not override EC CPR 69B 5.6. Further, the suggestion that a further application should have been issued and evidence filed justifying an extension of time for filing the main evidence on the substantive application before me is just the sort of technical, costly, inflexible and un-co-operative approach that the CPR and the overriding objective is directed at avoiding. In the case of filing of evidence close to a hearing, the main question is whether in the particular circumstances the hearing can go ahead with that evidence or whether it can only be dealt with fairly if there is an adjournment. If so the question will be whether an adjournment is appropriate or whether the hearing should go ahead and the evidence be excluded. Explanations as to why evidence was served when it was may be relevant to these questions and to costs but in most cases explanations on instructions will often suffice. Given that it was accepted the hearing should go ahead I did not demand explanations as to why evidence was served when it was and in the circumstances I am not prepared to draw inferences that the service of evidence on this application by the Claimants was either in breach of the rules, deliberately late or carelessly late in the sense of showing, as submitted by the Claimants in their skeleton argument: “sloppy and continued contempt” by Defs2/4 for the court’s processes. The explanations of D2/D4 [20]  The explanation as to why the witness statements of Defs2/4 were not served by 9 September 2016 is as follows. As can be deduced from the chronology set out above, the failure was as a result of M&C terminating their retainer and ceasing to act and new BVI lawyers having to be engaged.(1) As regards Defs2/4, responsibility for liaising with M&C on certain administrative matters, including billing and payment of their invoices, was delegated to one Cheung Ngai Lam (“Mr Cheung“), the Chief Finance Officer of Def1. Def3 is the Chairman of Def1. The payment of legal fees for Defs2/4 was a responsibility assumed by Def3. Mr Cheung would pass invoices from M&C to Mr Lai, the finance controller of Def1 to arrange settlement. Settlement was not made from the resources of Def1 but from those of Def3.(2) Between 2014 until February 2016, M&C’s invoices were settled from funds controlled by Def3 in Hong Kong. From that time there were insufficient funds available outside the People’s Republic of China (the ” PRC“) to meet the invoices of M&C. By June 2016, the funds in the Hong Kong SAR were exhausted. The significance of this is that foreign exchange control measures within the PRC, and the tightening of the same after 2015, made it difficult to obtain necessary approval to permit funds to be remitted outside the PRC, including to the Hong Kong SAR. The consequence was that by July 2016 there were several invoices outstanding to M&C in the total amount of approximately US$241,178.22.(3) On 28 June 2016, Mr Lai commenced steps, explained in more detail in his affirmation, to find out about and activate the process to enable funds to be remitted outside the PRC. On 4 July 2016, officials at the Foreign Exchange Bureau provided information that the approval process will take a relatively long time and it was impossible to predict when approval would be granted. Accordingly Mr Lai visited the relevant Foreign Exchange office in Zhangzhou on 11 July 2016 to find out if there was a way round the problem. It was suggested he should take advice from the bank. He visited a relevant bank on 18th July with a view to obtaining an overseas loan with a domestic guarantee and thereafter a number of other banks. The overseas loan route was not feasible because it required repayment with foreign funds, as to which there were none. He then approached the friends of Def3 with a view to raising overseas funds.(4) Meanwhile, on 20 July 2016, Mr Cheung received a communication from M&C requesting that the arrears of just over US$241,000 be cleared by 29 July 2016 and that a further sum on account of some US$300,000 be provided by 12 August 2016. In the absence of these payments M&C would cease work and terminate their engagement. In the meantime they would cease all work until full payment was received.(5) Given the then deadline of 30 August 2016 for Exchange, ongoing efforts were made to meet the requirements of M&C. On about 26 July, M&C were paid some US$131,367, essentially using overseas monies raised from friends of Def3, so the outstanding debt was then just under about US$110,000.(6) The deadline of 29 July payment of all arrears was not capable of being met. On that day M&C gave notice that they would apply to court to be removed from the record and would terminate their engagement. They said this could only be avoided by payment in full of the remaining invoices and the payment on account by 3 August 2016. By 3 August 2016, Mr Lai was able to pay the remaining arrears of just over US$110,000 again using overseas monies raised essentially from friends of D3. However, Mr Lai was unable immediately to raise the further US$300,000 required as a payment on account. M&C agreed to extend the deadline for this payment initially to 12 August and later to 15 August. On 16 August M&C formally terminated their retainer. By 19 August Mr Lai has been able to raise about US$200,000. M&C were however unmoved from their resolve to cease acting and to continue with their application to be removed from the record. Mr Cheung points out his affirmation at the letter from M&C referred to the need urgently to appoint new BVI lawyers, which was a process that was then engaged on. M&C did not apparently advise in terms that an application should be made for an extension of time to serve witness statements and although they remained on the record until Kobre & Kim filed a Notice of Acting on 14 September, they took no steps to request or apply for an extension of time for Exchange.(7) Mr Cheung was authorised by Defs2/4 to find and engage new BVI lawyers. This took time because of conflicts of interest and the need to find a firm that had the ability to communicate in Chinese. Contact with Kobre & Kim was first made on or about 26 August. A retainer was paid on or about 7 September. Kobre & Kim were officially engaged on 13 September. The application and the change of the solicitors on the record were made on 14 September. The majority of documents from M&C only started to be received on 15 September.(8) The failure to Exchange was therefore essentially because of difficulties in making timely payments to M&C, who as a result ceased work and later terminated their engagement.[21]  The original affidavit in support of the application by Defs2/4 was sworn by Mr Arthur of Kobre & Kim, Hong Kong. In that affidavit, he explained that there had been difficulties in the preparation of witness statements because there were no lawyers on the M&C team who spoke Mandarin. One of the reasons for selecting Kobre and Kim was that that firm could provide Mandarin speakers on their team acting for Defs2/4. I am satisfied on the evidence that Defs2/4 are not asserting that that the Mandarin language problems were of themselves a reason for the late Exchange, rather this is one of the reasons why Kobre & Kim were selected and why it took time to find replacement lawyers for M&C.[22]  I turn to the relevant requirements of EC CPR 26.8 I am satisfied that the application was made promptly. It was made within 5 days of the expiry of the deadline for Exchange of 9 September and the day that Kobre & Kim came on the record, having been formally engaged the day before.The requirements of EC CPR 26.8(2) [23]  Mr Addo submitted that the default was “intentional” because, and I summarise his position, Defs2/4 shut their eyes to the inevitable from February and simply disregarded the rules. I am satisfied that the default was not intentional. From July Defs2/4 were doing what they could do to resolve the position with M&C. Even if they were careless before that, they did not intentionally fail to Exchange.[24]  The more difficult question, and the one on which most time was spent in submission, was whether there was a “good explanation” for the failure. Mr Heylin, on behalf of Defs2/4, candidly accepted that the explanation given was not the “best” explanation, but he submitted that it was nevertheless a “good” explanation within the meaning of EC CPR 26.8(2)(b). Mr Addo said that the explanation was not a “good” explanation. He says that, on the evidence, from February it should have been obvious that something needed to be done. There is no evidence that anything was really done to start addressing the position until far too late in June. The foreign exchange measures were, or should have been, well known to Defs2/4. The proceedings are very serious, involving serious allegations and claims for substantial sums of money. The individuals involved on the side of Defs2/4 are sophisticated businessmen. The dilatory way in which the matter was dealt with is simply unacceptable, and does not provide a “good” explanation as to why sums that ran out with the entirely foreseeable consequence that Defs2/4 would lose the services of their BVI lawyers because the latter had not been paid.[25]  After the hearing, Mr Addo prayed in aid English authority specifically on the meaning of the provision of a “good reason” (or its application) in the context of the principles applied by the English court in deciding the issue of whether relief from sanctions should be granted. I note that the examples of “good reason” given in the Mitchell case,  [5]  although only examples, seem to envisage a very high standard of good reason, such as the serious illness or an accident suffered by the lawyer. However, the Court then went on to consider that there could be a spectrum of reasons from “very” good to ones that were weaker. In  Newland Shipping & Forwarding Ltd v Toba Trading FZC   [6]   the Court was faced with the question of an application for an extension of time. This arose from the loss of lawyers in circumstances where there was a dispute over fees. The court refused the same but on the basis that:”  Any difficulties that arose as a result of loss of representation were therefore foreseeable consequences of D1 not being prepared to pay fees which it was able to pay, but chose not to. That is not a good reason for default.” [26]  Mr Addo says that, as in the Newland Shipping case this was one where there was a lengthy build up to the withdrawal and it could have been planned for.[27]  In my view it is very much a fact dependent question as to whether an explanation is a “good explanation” within EC CPR 26.8(2). Furthermore, the quality of the explanation has to be viewed against all the circumstances and not simply by reference to the question of whether all was done that could have been done. A “good explanation” is a universal standard, in the same way that the duty of care in negligence is, but what is required to discharge that standard will depend on the particular facts and circumstances. What may be required to be done (and which will therefore amount to a good explanation if done) where, for example, missing a deadline will necessarily involve losing a trial date may be much more than in other circumstances. Similarly, the attributes of the individuals involved may be relevant factors as to what will be required of them by way of conduct such that the circumstances in which they fail to serve witness statements on time may be said to amount to a “good explanation”.[28]  Unlike the Newlands Shipping case this was not one where the applicants for relief simply chose not to pay their solicitors knowing the consequences (in the Newlands Shipping case the solicitors were later re-instructed and the inference is that they were in fact paid the formerly disputed sums). I accept, as did Mr Heylin, that the explanation is not the “best” one nor even a “very” good one. However, in my view it just scrapes by as a “good explanation”. The raising of money from friends and associates was clearly a matter of last resort and desperation and I do not consider that it is fair to say that when efforts were made funds were quickly raised and this course should have been taken much earlier and the failure to do so means that there is no good explanation. The court should always be wary of being too wise after the event.[29]  I should add that I am not impressed by the submission that the failure of Defs2/4 to ask the Claimants for extensions itself amounts to an absence of “good explanation” for the failure to Exchange by the deadline. It is clear that the Claimants would not have permitted an extension. The failure to ask for one can hardly therefore be seen as a causative of the missed deadline. Had they asked for an extension this would not, in my view, have changed the situation such as that there would then have been a “good” explanation for the default, had there not been one before that.[29]  That leaves the issue as to whether Defs2/4 have “generally” complied with relevant orders, Practice Directions etc. I have dealt with some alleged failings in this respect above and found they are not made out. Mr Addo relied on Defs2/4’s need for extensions. However, if extensions were granted then there was no relevant breach. The only matter he was able to raise was the failure to serve a defence in time in the case of Def2. That matter was later dealt with on an agreed basis. In my view it does not demonstrate that Def2 (and certainly not Defs3/4) had not generally complied with relevant orders etc.Discretion [30]  It is therefore necessary for me to turn to the factors set out in CPR 26.8.(1) Effect on the parties: Obviously there is a serious effect on D2/4 if relief from sanctions and an extension is not granted. So far as the Claimants are concerned, there has been a rescheduling of the timetable to trial (without prejudice to this application) and the trial date is not lost. There may have been some additional costs incurred but if that is the case then it can be compensated for separately.(2) The interests of the administration of justice: the interests of the administration of justice are on the one hand that parties can put forward their whole case and evidence before the court and on the other hand that timetables are kept to and that this is encouraged by the deterrence factor of the sanction applied in the rules, otherwise where there are breaches the court’s resources can be wasted (by application such as these and/or by lost trial dates) and other litigants are affected. Here, the default does not appear to have caused loss of the trial date (though this is a separate factor anyway).(3) Remedy of default: here the position has been remedied although it took a month, but given the change in solicitors that is not an unreasonable time.(4) Responsibility: the fault appears to lie with D2/4 not its solicitors.(5) Trial date: as mentioned the likely trial date will still be met and the parties have worked on in the meantime but without prejudice to the outcome of D2/4’s application.Disposition [31]  Having regard to the above factors in all the circumstances I am satisfied that it is appropriate to grant relief from the relevant sanction imposed and to extend time for D2/4 to file and exchange witness statements until 14 October 2016.[32]  It follows that the Second Application seeking an order striking out the defence of D2/4, alternatively an unless order, is dismissed.[33]  I will hear from the parties further on the form of any order and any consequential matters, including costs.Malcolm Davis-White QC (Ag) Commercial Court Judge [1]  Court of Appeal, (Civil appeal no. 15 of 2005). [2]  Court of Appeal, (DOMHCVAP 2005/0015). [3]  Court of Appeal, (SLUHCVAP 2013/0009). [4]  [2014] EWCA Civ 906. [5]  Mitchell v News Group Newspapers Limited [2013] EWCA Civ 1537; [2014] 1 W.L.R. 795. [6]  [2014] EWHC 210 (Comm)      /qvt-fund-v-lp-et-al-v-china-zenix-auto-international-group-limited-et-al/           Prev 
Bank of America N.A. v Pacific Andes Enterprises (BVI) Limited et al    Next  Kenneth M. Krys and Charlotte Ward-Caulfield  email             close   Contact Subscribe   Our Goal is to ensure that all users have the same experience and ease of accessing all court related information. Please let help us with this goal by letting us know what issues you had with the website.   Name(required) Last Name Email(required) Feedback/ Message(required)    Email Subscriptions Submit your email address and name to subscribe for email notifcations.  Notification Categories Select the areas you are interested in receving notifcations for.   Judgments  Sittings Jobs        BookmarkRemove Item  Sign in to continue  or      Username / Email    Password   Sign in       close     Saved Articles    event {{post.date}}           View              User Settings     Account Details   Eccourts Account:  User Name:  Account Type:      Notifications    Desktop Notifications This module enables desktop notification fucntionality for chrome and firefox users. Receieve notications directly on your Android, Windows, Safari, Chrome or IOS enabled Devices.    Notifation Categories    Unregister Device   Delete Device Subscription    Save         Home  Judgments  Sittings  News more 

 QVT Fund V LP et al v China Zenix Auto International Group Ltd et al                       clear all filters      {{term.terms}}      Minimize Search Window                {{item.title}}  Filter By Category {{SelectedFilters.length}}x Categories         Judgments    Court of Appeal     High Court     Digest of Decs..    Sittings    Jobs               {{item.title}}  {{selectedCountries.length}}x Countries   Country       Anguilla Antigua Grenada Dominica Montserrat Saint Kitts Saint Lucia Saint Vincent T.V.I                {{item.title}}  Filter By Year  {{selectedOptions.length}}x Options     2017 2016 2015 2014 2013 2012 2011 2010 2009 2008 2007 2006 2005 2004 2003 2002 2001 2000 1999 1998 1997 1996 1995         Sorry can't find what you're looking for try adjusting your search terms           {{doc._source.post_title}}                      Page {{indexVM.page}}  of {{indexVM.pageCount}}               pdf Text  Home » Judgments » High Court Judgments » QVT Fund V LP et al v China Zenix Auto International Group Ltd et al             IN THE EASTERN CARIBBEAN SUPREME COURTTERRITORY OF THE VIRGIN ISLANDSCOMMERCIAL DIVISION IN THE HIGH COURT OF JUSTICE CLAIM NO. BVI HC (COM) 0026 OF 2014  BETWEEN:  (1) QVT Fund V LP(2) QVT Fund IV LP(3) Quintessence Fund LP Claimants/RespondentsAnd (1)  China Zenix Auto International Group Ltd(2)  Richwise international Investment Group Ltd(3)  Jianhui Lai(4)  Richburg Holding LtdDefendants Appearances:Mr. Jonathan Addo of Harneys for the Claimants;Mr. Adam Hinks of Conyers Dill & Pearman for the First Defendant;Messrs. Alex Heylin and Tim de Swardt of Kobre & Kim for the Second to Fourth Defendants.———————————————————2017: January 11, 12; 24.——————————————————–  JUDGMENT[1]  I ask the parties to forgive the brevity of this ruling which has taken longer to finalise than I would have wanted.[2]  The Application is made by the Claimant for specific disclosure of 18 classes of documents (a through to r) pursuant to CPR Part 28. The Application was resisted by the Defendants. During the course of the hearing, Mr. Addo for the Claimants indicated that the Application was no longer being pursued with respect to 7 of these classes, namely classes g), i), j), l), m), n) and p).[3]  A submission was made by Mr. Heylin, who appeared for the Second to Fourth Defendants, which he asked to be treated as a point in limine even though at my invitation he addressed it in his reply to Mr. Addo. I propose to deal with this point first.[4]  Mr. Heylin’s submission, which was endorsed by Mr Hinks who appeared for the First Defendant, was that the lateness of the Application coupled with the absence of a good explanation in the supporting evidence for its timing meant that the court should exercise its discretion against making the Order sought by the Applicants.[5]  The relevant chronology appears to be that standard disclosure and inspection was to have been completed by the end of March 2016 and extended by agreement to April 2016; in June 2016 the Applicants’ legal practitioners in correspondence identified the classes of documents for which additional disclosure was required; in December 2016 the Application for specific disclosure was issued with a hearing date in mid-January 2017; the trial has been fixed to commence in March 2017.[6]  Mr. Addo responded to this submission by pointing out that the Defendants had been aware from June 2016 of what the Claimants were requesting by way of additional disclosure and the Application in December 2016 merely set out this previous request in more detail. This submission was helpfully endorsed by Mr. Heylin’s mark-up of the letter of 27 June 2016 from the solicitors for the Claimants. Mr. Addo further submitted by way of explanation for the timing that the Claimants were awaiting the court’s decision as to whether the Second to Fourth Defendants would be allowed to put in and rely on their witness statements which were filed out of time.[7]  Mr. Addo also submitted that the court should take cognisance of the responses by the Respondents in correspondence to the Application in December 2016. On 23rd December, the legal representatives for the First Defendant indicated that the company is prepared to conduct a further search for any of the requested classes of documents. On 28 th December 2016, the legal representatives of the Second to Fourth Defendants indicated that their clients were seeking to review further records and intended to provide reasonable and proportionate disclosure. The witness statements of Messrs Shi, Lai and Cheung also addressed directly the requests made in the Application.[8]  My attention was directed to the decisions of the English High Court inBanwaith [2013] EWHC 883; Fox [2013] EWHC 4012 and Monde Petroleum [2016] EWHC 755.[9]  In Banwaith the Application for specific disclosure was dismissed inter alia on the ground that it was issued very late (17 days before trial) and a month after it had been settled. The court, however, indicated several other grounds on which it refused to order specific disclosure so it is fairly clear to me that the timing, which was more egregious than in the instant case, was not a dispositive point. In Fox, the relevant passage appears to be the final paragraph of the judgment of Tugendhat J where he found that the disclosure exercise (based on the vague and overly wide classes requested by the Applicant) would be disproportionate and oppressive in light of the short period before the trial was due to start. That period was approximately 2 months from the hearing date.[10] In Monde Petroleum, the Application was issued approximately 5 weeks before trial. The Application was refused on the grounds that it was made too late, was unlikely to turn up any evidence of relevance and would have been a disproportionately expensive exercise within the period before trial.[11] Having reviewed these authorities, I am of the view that the issue of the timing of an application for specific disclosure is not dispositive but is merely a discretionary matter and it was therefore correct to have Mr. Heylin make these submissions as part of his reply. I will therefore consider this issue in the context of the general matters for consideration under CPR Part 28 and the overriding objective which I must bear in mind in exercising my discretion.[12] The Claimants’ Application seeks an Order for disclosure of documents identified by them by class. An Order can only be made for disclosure of documents that are directly relevant to one of more matters in issue. Under CPR 28.1 (4) a document is “directly relevant” if the party with control of it intends to rely on it; it tends to adversely affect his case; or it tends to support another party’s case. A document is disclosed if the party reveals that it exists or has existed. Documents mean anything on or in which information is recorded. In deciding whether to order specific disclosure, in accordance with CPR 28.6 I must consider whether this order is necessary in order to dispose fairly of the claim or to save costs and have regard to the likely benefits and cost of specific disclosure and whether I am satisfied that the financial resources of the Defendants against whom disclosure is sought are likely to be sufficient to enable them to comply with the Order. As a background to these specific matters, I have to bear in mind that I should strive to give effect to the overriding objective to deal with the Application in a manner that is just and proportionate in the context of the litigation between the parties and more general requirements of the administration of justice.[13] The starting point must be to consider what is at stake in the action. The Claimants are the minority shareholders of the First Defendant, a BVI company that operates as a holding company via a Hong Kong company for sub-subsidiaries in China that are involved in the manufacture of wheels. The other Defendants are alleged to be involved in the conduct of which complaint is made on the claim. The nub of the Claimants’ complaint is that the Second to Fourth Defendants sent a restructuring proposal to the board of directors of the First Defendant in November 2013 proposing effectively that the First Defendant should transfer the majority of its interest in the Hong Kong holding company (and effectively in the wheel manufacturing business) to the Third Defendant and acquire via a share swap the unidentified holding company of an online rental property business at a price based on a purely private valuation by the owners of that business which included the Third Defendant himself. They further complain that (i) the moving forces behind the proposal were the Third and Fourth Defendants who own between them 75% of the shares of the First Defendant; (ii) the First Defendant issued a press release in November 2013 regarding its receipt of the proposal; and (ii) even though the proposal was withdrawn subsequently, there has been no guarantee that it will not be implemented at a later date.[14] The Claimants aver that the effect of the publication of the proposal was that the share price of the First Defendant collapsed, which ought to have been a foreseeable consequence to the Defendants and that this also would have been the consequence of the implementation of the proposal as the online business was worth significantly less than the $300million asserted by the Second to Fourth Defendants.[15] It is the Claimants’ case in a nutshell that the First Defendant has acted oppressively and unfairly discriminated or favoured the interests of the second to fourth Defendants by inter alia (i) agreeing to the publication of the restructuring proposal while not publicly releasing the name or details of the online business so as to allow the merits of the proposal to be examined and it should have been apparent that the uncertainty so created would negatively impact the value of the First Defendant’s listed shares; (ii) refusing to provide details of the proposal so that the Claimants can assess its merits and as a consequence putting the majority shareholders (who have such knowledge) in a different position to the Claimants; and (iii) expressing their intention only to release information after they have announced an agreement to the proposed restructuring thereby depriving the Claimants from taking any effective action to protect their own interests and that of the First Defendant.[16] The Claimants seek purchase of their shares by the Second to Fourth defendants under the Business Companies Act 2004 section 184I on the ground of unfair prejudice and oppression; an Order under section 184B to restrain the company from implementing the proposal; and for damages for conspiracy to injure.[17] The Defences in summary are (i) that the proposal has been withdrawn; (ii) that the Claimants have made further investments in the First Defendant since the conduct complained of; (iii) the proposal was merely a proposal and there was no conspiracy among the Defendants to injure or to cause loss or to do an unlawful act; (iv) the value ascribed to the online business was genuinely held and the Second and Fourth Defendants genuinely believed that the online business would be more profitable than the wheel business.[18] As part of the case management process under the rules, the parties submitted a list of issues to be determined at trial which included (i) whether the proposed restructuring amounted to unfairly prejudicial conduct by the Defendant and (ii) whether the conduct of the Defendants before and after the withdrawal of the proposal constitute an actionable conspiracy.[19] At the heart of the claim therefore lie questions concerning the motive and intentions that lay behind the impugned conduct of the Defendants at the relevant time.[20] The Defendants mounted a second line of attack that the evidence in support of the Application was defective in that it failed to explain why it is reasonable and proportionate for each class of documents to be disclosed and that any explanation was made via submissions rather than in the evidence in support of the Application. The force of this submission is somewhat diminished by the fact that the Defendants, in response to service of the Application and evidence in December 2016, undertook to do further searches for documents falling within the classes formulated by the Claimants.[21] The Defendants also submit that the Claimants’ evidence on the Application is defective in that they do not confirm the existence of the documents sought nor do they explain the direct relevance and necessity of each document sought.[22] I agree with the criticism of the evidence made by the Defendants but am of the view that in the context that (i) they had been aware of the classes since mid-2016 and had agreed then to search and (ii) they repeated their offer to search in December 2016, the court can assume that the Defendants, rightfully in furtherance of the overriding objective, had no strenuous objection to the relevance of the classes in issue or that disclosure of such documents would be disproportionate to the achievement of the objective of a just disposal of the claim.[23] Nevertheless, as the Claimants have made the Application rather than rely on the undertakings given by the Defendants to conduct the searches, they must satisfy me of (i) the direct relevance of the documents they seek to the issues to be determined at trial; (ii) that the Order that they seek is necessary to dispose of the claim fairly and (iii) the Order will be proportionate in all the circumstances including the limited time left before trial.[24] Mr. Addo justifies the classes of documents sought by the fact that they deal with documents that relate to the period immediately prior to the announcement of the proposed restructuring. The Claimants’ position (if I may paraphrase) is that the disclosure sought is necessary and proportionate because (i) the Defendants were advised on the restructuring proposal by Houlihan Lokey, investment bankers, but no documents from that company or from the company’s attorneys who were also advising have been disclosed; (ii) the Defendants were similarly advised with respect to the withdrawal of the proposal and nature of this advice is also necessary to determine the state of mind of the principal actors which is relevant to the claims in conspiracy as well as for oppression and unfair prejudice; and (iii) it is likely that such advice above must have been in the form of documents which are directly relevant to the issues and should have been disclosed.[25] Having reviewed the issues raised by the claim I am in agreement with Mr. Addo that at the highest level any documents that provide an understanding of what went on prior to the communication and publication of the proposal would be directly relevant to the Claimants’ complaint about the conduct of the Defendants. In light of the responses by the Defendants to the Application, I do not find that the shortcomings in the Claimants’ evidence were critical as the Defendants did not seem to be in any doubt about what they were to search for. I can now turn to the classes of documents of which the Claimants seek disclosure.[26] Class a) seeks all correspondence between the second and fourth Defendants or their representatives relating to the proposed restructuring including activities undertaken to formulate the proposed restructuring. Class b) seeks any undisclosed internal conversations relating to the proposed restructuring as referred to in the email from Frank Li dated 23 rd November 2013. Class c) seeks all correspondence between the Defendants.[27] Mr. Heylin submitted that Mr. Shi and Mr. Lai gave evidence of the method of their communications and that the Claimants must be bound by such evidence: see Henderson v Overall (2001) Unreported. I agree. However, as class a) also seeks communications between representatives of these parties and the Defendants’ evidence does not address the existence of representatives, I am prepared to allow class a). I do not allow classes b) and c) on account of vagueness with respect to class b) and the width with respect to class c) and the fact that they do not seem to add to class a).[28] Class d) seeks disclosure of documentary correspondence between the Second to Fourth Defendants and their financial advisor and any affiliate or representative of the advisor. There was no strong objection to this class of documents from the Defendants. I am prepared to allow it but in a narrower form than that sought by the Claimants. The documents should be correspondence in relation to the proposed restructuring of the First Defendant and its Hong Kong subsidiary that was communicated to the First Defendant in November 2013.[29] Class e) seeks disclosure of communications between the Third Defendant and his legal counsel in relation to the proposed restructuring. The Defendants objected to this class (and made a similar objection to class h) that these documents are covered by legal professional privilege. I am of the view that legal professional privilege is not in itself a bar to disclosure: see Matthews and Malek 5th ed para 6.15. Such privilege merely requires the person claiming the privilege to indicate his right to withhold inspection and the ground on which he does so. It would therefore be premature for me at this stage to seek to rule on the specific issues of privilege as was argued by the parties. My difficulty with class e) is that the Claimants have not satisfied me that such documents, so far as they are not subject to privilege, are directly relevant to the conduct of the Company or the other defendants of which complaint is made. It seems to me that unless the Third Defendant shared those documents with his alleged co-conspirators or with the Company so that this formed part of the motive or intention of the Company in carrying out its actions, the Claimants cannot say that they are needed to dispose of the claim fairly.[30] Classes f) and q) are the same and are directed primarily at the First Defendant which has given evidence through Mr. Cheung that the company does not believe that it has any further correspondence as sought under this class but has directed its agents to conduct further searches of their records. I regard that the relevance and proportionality of this class have been accepted by the First Defendant and that the statement that it does not believe that further documents exist is not sufficiently definite to put it in the category of the statements made in Henderson v Overall. I will therefore allow these classes. So far as a claim is made that any such documents are privileged so as not to be liable to inspection by shareholders of the Company receiving the advice, my comments above on the requirements of disclosure will apply.[31]  Classes h) and r) can be taken together as Mr. Addo has frankly admitted that these classes are duplicative of each other. These classes deal with the issue of the withdrawal of the restructuring proposal and there appears to be substantial overlap between these classes. The undoubted target of these classes is the Houlihan Lokey correspondence and any correspondence with the legal advisors that does not attract privilege. I agree with Mr. Addo that it is likely that Houlihan Lokey’s communication with the Third Defendant would have been by way of documents rather than purely orally. I also agree that any instructions to or advice from attorneys would also be directly relevant and so subject to disclosure with the usual limitation as to inspection where legal professional privilege is claimed.[32] Mr. Shi’s evidence is that there are no minutes of meetings among consortium members so this sub-class of documents must be excluded. However, this evidence is specific and does not address the existence of documents other than minutes of meetings and communications between himself and Mr. Lai which both claim were oral only. The First Defendant also relies on Mr. Sharp’s evidence that the proposed meeting between the third Defendant and the Special Committee in July 2014 did not take place before the withdrawal of the proposal was announced and no reasons other than those contained in the announcement of the withdrawal of the proposal were given to the members of the Special Committee. Again I consider that this evidence, which was not given in the specific context of this Application, is very specific and does not address communications with the First Defendant generally but only with the Committee. Neither the Claimants’ evidence on the Application nor their submissions at the hearing addressed the existence or identity of 3rd parties.[33] I am prepared to permit class r) but as I am of the view that this substantially duplicates the material aspects of class h), there is no need for class h).[34] I will deal with classes k) and o) together as they both shift the focus of any disclosure to EStay. With respect to class o), Mr. Addo has not satisfied me that the appointment of Mr. Gao bears any direct relevance to the matters in issue nor that even if there is some tangential relevance, that documents in relation to this appointment would assist the court in disposing of the claim fairly. I therefore do not permit this class. In my view, class k) is more justifiable as being directly relevant to the claim in conspiracy in particular. However, I am of the view that this class is too widely stated and that any disclosure should be limited to correspondence including minutes of meetings between the Consortium and/or its representatives and EStay and/or its representatives prior to the announcement of the Proposed Restructuring relating to the ownership, nature and value of the business of EStay.[35] I now consider whether there are any relevant factors that should cause me to exercise my discretion against making an Order along the lines that I have indicated in the preceding paragraphs. I believe that timing is a critical consideration but in light of the fact that these classes were (i) advanced since June 2016 and (ii) the requests, including this Application, were met generally with promises of cooperation rather than objection, the timing of the Application and of this decision should not prevent me from making the Order. None of the parties advanced evidence or submissions concerning expense of the exercise of disclosure or its effect on the resources of the parties even though this exercise would have been in train since late December 2016 at the very latest so considerations of likely expense or of the resources also should not adversely affect my decision.[36] I also consider taking the matter as a whole that the disclosure sought appears to be proportionate to the issues joined by the parties in the proceedings and the likely advantage to the trial judge of having the fullest evidence before him at the hearing the claim.[37] I have considered the submission made by the Defendants that the Claimants have not given specific evidence that the documents exist. CPR Part 28.5 permits me to order inter alia that searches be made for the documents. The appropriate Order should therefore be that the Defendants should carry out a search for documents in the classes permitted above and that any document located as a result of that search should be disclosed to the Claimants forthwith in light of the time constraints facing the parties. I appreciate that this may mean that more than one list may have to be prepared in the circumstances but I believe that the costs of so doing are unlikely to outweigh the benefits of all parties having the opportunity to consider the disclosed documents at the earliest opportunity and to make any further applications with respect to documents over which privilege is claimed.[38] I will hear the parties on the costs of the Application.Commercial Court Judge 24th January 2017       /qvt-fund-v-lp-et-al-v-china-zenix-auto-international-group-ltd-et-al/           Prev 
Sheikh Abdullah Alhamrani v Sheikh Mohamed Ali M Alhamrani et al    Next  Muhammed Nazir Muhammed Ismail et al v Inderjit Kaur Chhina et al  email             close   Contact Subscribe   Our Goal is to ensure that all users have the same experience and ease of accessing all court related information. Please let help us with this goal by letting us know what issues you had with the website.   Name(required) Last Name Email(required) Feedback/ Message(required)    Email Subscriptions Submit your email address and name to subscribe for email notifcations.  Notification Categories Select the areas you are interested in receving notifcations for.   Judgments  Sittings Jobs        BookmarkRemove Item  Sign in to continue  or      Username / Email    Password   Sign in       close     Saved Articles    event {{post.date}}           View              User Settings     Account Details   Eccourts Account:  User Name:  Account Type:      Notifications    Desktop Notifications This module enables desktop notification fucntionality for chrome and firefox users. Receieve notications directly on your Android, Windows, Safari, Chrome or IOS enabled Devices.    Notifation Categories    Unregister Device   Delete Device Subscription    Save         Home  Judgments  Sittings  News more 



QVT Fund V LP - CEO, founder, businessman - profile

















directorpedia.net - List of CEOs, founders, board members and company directors











QVT Fund V LP
Check out list of companies and businesses related to QVT Fund V LP. Find out QVT Fund V LP address and contact details. View other people related to QVT Fund V LP - coworkers, colleagues, companions, etc.
Address:   

1177 AVENUE OF THE AMERICAS, 9TH FLOOR  NEW YORK 10036 NY




Companies related to QVT Fund V LP
CIKCompany NamePositionCompany Address0001098972AGENUS INC3 FORBES ROAD  LEXINGTON 024210001367920CONCERT PHARMACEUTICALS, INC.99 HAYDEN AVENUE SUITE 500 LEXINGTON 02421




QVT Fund V LP on the Web
Persons related to QVT Fund V LP - AGENUS INCNamePositionCityNOUBAR  AFEYANDirector LEXINGTONGARO H  ARMENChairman & CEO NEW YORKGARO H  ARMENChairman & CEO NEW YORKGARO H  ARMENChairman & CEO NEW YORKGARO H  ARMENChairman & CEO NEW YORKGARO H  ARMENChairman & CEO LEXINGTONGARO H  ARMENChairman and CEO NEW YORKGARO H  ARMENChairman & CEO NEW YORKGARO H  ARMENChairman & CEO NEW YORKGARO H  ARMENChairman and CEO NEW YORKGARO H  ARMENChairman & CEO NEW YORKGARO H  ARMENChairman & CEO NEW YORKGARO H  ARMENChairman & CEO NEW YORKFRANK V  ATLEE IIIDirector FRANK V  ATLEE IIIDirector NEW YORKCharles Evan  BallantyneCFO NEWTONOzer  BaysalChief Business Officer LEXINGTONOzer  BaysalChief Business Officer LEXINGTONCorvese  BrianNew YorkCORVESE  BRIANLEXINGTONCorvese  BrianLexingtonJennifer  BuellLEXINGTONGAMIL DE  CHADAREVIANDirector NEW YORKGAMIL DE  CHADAREVIANDirector NEW YORKBallantyne  CharlesLexingtonRoman  ChiczSVP, Research and Development LEXINGTONKLASKIN  CHRISTINELEXINGTONKlaskin  ChristineLexingtonKlaskin  ChristineNew YorkKlaskin  ChristineNew YorkJEFF D  CLARKJEFF D  CLARKChief Financial Officer NEW YORKBrian  CorveseDirector NEW YORKBrian  CorveseDirector NEW YORKBrian  CorveseDirector LEXINGTONBrian  CorveseDirector NEW YORKJean-Marie  CuillerotChief Medical Officer LEXINGTONRAYMOND  DEBBANENEW YORKTOM  DECHAENEDirector NEW YORKTOM  DECHAENEDirector NEW YORKTOM  DECHAENEDirector NEW YORKTOM  DECHAENEDirector TOM  DECHAENEDirector NEW YORKTOM  DECHAENEDirector NEW YORKTOM  DECHAENEDirector NEW YORKTOM  DECHAENEDirector NEW YORKTOM  DECHAENEDirector NEW YORKTOM  DECHAENEDirector NEW YORKTOM  DECHAENEDirector LEXINGTONAlex  DuncanLEXINGTONARMEN  GAROLEXINGTONArmen  GaroLexingtonArmen  GaroNew YorkArmen  GaroNew YorkNEAL  GORDONSrVP, Manufacturing Operations LEXINGTONRENU  GUPTANEW YORKRENU  GUPTASr. Vice President NEW YORKRENU  GUPTASVP, Development JOHN  HATSOPOULOSDirector NEW YORKJOHN  HATSOPOULOSDirector NEW YORKJOHN  HATSOPOULOSDirector WALTHAMJOHN  HATSOPOULOSDirector NEW YORKJOHN  HATSOPOULOSDirector NEW YORKJOHN  HATSOPOULOSDirector LEXINGTONJOHN  HATSOPOULOSDirector NEW YORKRUSSELL  HERNDONPres, Commercial Operations SUDBURYLevitsky, M.D  HyamNew YorkINCYTE CORPWILMINGTONInvus Public Equities Advisors, LLCNEW YORKInvus Public Equities, LPNEW YORKHatsopoulos  JohnNew YorkWADIH  JORDANDirector FRANKLIN LAKESWADIH  JORDANDirector NEW YORKWADIH  JORDANDirector NEW YORKWADIH  JORDANDirector NEW YORKWADIH  JORDANDirector NEW YORKWADIH  JORDANDirector NEW YORKWADIH  JORDANDirector NEW YORKWADIH  JORDANDirector NEW YORKWADIH  JORDANDirector NEW YORKWADIH  JORDANDirector NEW YORKWADIH  JORDANDirector LEXINGTONValentine  KarenLexingtonVALENTINE  KARENLEXINGTONValentine  KarenLexingtonBRAD M  KELLEYLOUISVILLEWentworth  KerryLexingtonWENTWORTH  KERRYLEXINGTONMARK  KESSELDirector NEW YORKCHRISTINE M  KLASKINVP, Finance NEW YORKCHRISTINE M  KLASKINVP, Finance NEW YORKCHRISTINE M  KLASKINVP Finance NEW YORKCHRISTINE M  KLASKINVP Finance NEW YORKCHRISTINE M  KLASKINVP, Finance LEXINGTONBruce  LeicherVP, General Counsel LEXINGTONHyam  LevitskyDirector NEW YORKHyam  LevitskyDirector NEW YORKHyam  LevitskyDirector NEW YORKShahzad  MalikDirector GAITHERSBURGShahzad  MalikROCKVILLEShahzad  MalikDirector LEXINGTONEISEN  MARGARETDirector DARIENBaysal  OzerLexingtonQVT Associates GP LLC10% Owner NEW YORKStein  RobertLexingtonTIMOTHY G  ROTHWELLDirector NEW YORKTIMOTHY G  ROTHWELLDirector NEW YORKTIMOTHY G  ROTHWELLDirector Malik  ShahzadLexingtonSharp  ShaliniNew YorkSharp  ShaliniNew YorkSHARP  SHALINILEXINGTONSharp  ShaliniLexingtonShalini  SharpDirector NEW YORKShalini  SharpDirector LEXINGTONShalini  SharpCFO NEW YORKShalini  SharpCFO NEW YORKShalini  SharpDirector NEW YORKShalini  SharpDirector NEW YORKShalini  SharpDirector NEW YORKShalini  SharpDirector NEW YORKShalini  SharpDirector NEW YORKShalini  SharpDirector NEW YORKPRAMOD  SRIVASTAVADirector AVONRobert Benjamin  SteinPresident R&D LEXINGTONPeter  ThorntonDirector NEW YORK CITYPeter  ThorntonDirector NEW YORK CITYRothwell  TimothyNew YorkWright  TimothyNew YorkWRIGHT  TIMOTHYLEXINGTONWright  TimothyLexingtonDechaene  TomNew YorkDECHAENE  TOMLEXINGTONDechaene  TomLexingtonWiinberg  UlfLexingtonUlys, LLCNEW YORKKaren  ValentineChief Legal Officer LEXINGTONKaren  ValentineVP, General Counsel LEXINGTONJordan  WadihNew YorkJORDAN  WADIHLEXINGTONJordan  WadihLexingtonKerry  WentworthVP Reg Affairs & Clinical Ops NEW YORKKerry  WentworthVP, Clinical, Reg & Qual LEXINGTONKerry  WentworthVP, Clin, Reg & Quality NEW YORKKerry  WentworthNEW YORKKerry  WentworthVP, Clinical, Reg, & Quality NEW YORKKerry  WentworthVP, Clinical, Reg, & Quality NEW YORKKerry  WentworthVP, Clin, Reg & Quality LEXINGTONKerry  WentworthVP Clinical, Reg & Quality LEXINGTONKerry  WentworthVP Clin, Reg & Quality NEW YORKKerry  WentworthVP, Clinicial, Reg, & Quality LEXINGTONULF  WIINBERGDirector MADISONAlastair JJ  WoodDirector NASHVILLETimothy  WrightDirector LEXINGTONTimothy  WrightDirector LEXINGTONPersons related to QVT Fund V LP - CONCERT PHARMACEUTICALS, INC.NamePositionCityAdage Capital Advisors, L.L.C.BOSTONADAGE CAPITAL PARTNERS GP LLCBOSTONAdage Capital Partners, L.P.10% Owner BOSTONNOUBAR  AFEYANCAMBRIDGERICHARD  ALDRICHDirector BOSTONRICHARD  ALDRICHDirector LEXINGTONRobert  AtchinsonBOSTONThomas G  AuchinclossDirector CAMBRIDGEThomas G  AuchinclossDirector LEXINGTONRonald W  BarrettDirector SANTA CLARARonald W  BarrettLEXINGTONHubert  BirnerMUNICHBROOKSIDE CAPITAL INVESTORS L PBOSTONBROOKSIDE CAPITAL MANAGEMENT LLC10% Owner BOSTONBROOKSIDE CAPITAL PARTNERS FUND LPBOSTONJames V  CassellaChief Development Officer PALO ALTOJames V  CassellaLEXINGTONPhilippe O.  ChambonNEW YORKD. Ryan  DawsChief Financial Officer LEXINGTONJeani  DelagardelleSAN MATEOStefan  FischerMUNICHMeghan  FitzgeraldDirector NEW HAVENFlagship Ventures Fund 2004 L P10% Owner CAMBRIDGEFlagship Ventures General Partner LLCCAMBRIDGEJohn Gordon  FreundDirector PALO ALTOJohn Gordon  FreundPALO ALTOJohn Gordon  FreundPALO ALTOPLC  GLAXOSMITHKLINEBRENTFORD MIDDLESEXPLC  GLAXOSMITHKLINE BRENTFORD MIDDLESEX,Alexandra  GollMUNICHAlexandra  GollMUNICHXII-A Limited Partnership  GreylockMENLO PARKGreylock XII GP LLC10% Owner MENLO PARKXII Limited Partnership  GreylockMENLO PARKPhillip  GrossBOSTONLYNETTE  HERSCHAGeneral Counsel LEXINGTONRONALD  HUNTNEW YORKPETER BARTON  HUTTDirector IRVINEPETER BARTON  HUTTDirector LEXINGTONWILFRED E  JAEGERDirector PORTOLA VALLEYWILFRED E  JAEGERPORTOLA VALLEYYASUNORI  KANEKOPALO ALTOYASUNORI  KANEKOPALO ALTOEDWIN M  KANIA JRCAMBRIDGEVijay K  LathiSAN MATEORyan  LynchPFO, PAO LEXINGTONPauline  McGowanVP, Finance LEXINGTONNew Leaf Venture Management I, L.L.C.NEW YORKNew Leaf Venture Management I, L.P.NEW YORKNew Leaf Ventures I, L.P.10% Owner NEW YORKJAMES  NIEDELNEW YORKAxel  PolackMUNICHAxel  PolackMUNICHQVT Associates GP LLC10% Owner NEW YORKQVT Fund LPGEORGE TOWN, GRAND CAYMANLiam  RatcliffeNEW YORKHELMUT  SCHUHSLERDirector MUNICHHELMUT  SCHUHSLERMUNICHRobert  SilvermanSenior VP, General Counsel LEXINGTONSkyline Venture Management IV, LLCPALO ALTOSkyline Venture Management IV, LLCPALO ALTOSkyline Venture Partners Qualified Purchaser Fund IV L PPALO ALTOSkyline Venture Partners Qualified Purchaser Fund IV L P10% Owner PALO ALTONancy  StuartChief Operating Officer LEXINGTONTHREE ARCH ASSOCIATES III LPPORTOLA VALLEYTHREE ARCH ASSOCIATES IV LPPORTOLA VALLEYTHREE ARCH MANAGEMENT III LLCPORTOLA VALLEYTHREE ARCH MANAGEMENT III LLCDirector PORTOLA VALLEYThree Arch Management IV, L.L.C.Director PORTOLA VALLEYTHREE ARCH PARTNERS III LPPORTOLA VALLEYTHREE ARCH PARTNERS III LPPORTOLA VALLEYTHREE ARCH PARTNERS IV LPPORTOLA VALLEYRoger D  TungChief Executive Officer LEXINGTONTVM Life Science Ventures VI GmbH & Co KGDirector MUNICHTVM Life Science Ventures VI LPMUNICHHeek Christi  vanDirector PALO ALTOMARK A  WANPORTOLA VALLEYMARK A  WANPORTOLA VALLEYWENDALL  WIERENGADirector LEXINGTONWENDALL D  WIERENGADirector SAN DIEGO
Potentially same personNameCityCountryQVT Fund V LPNEW YORKNY












 









QVT FUND V LP Top Holdings  

































WhaleWisdom









Search All
Search 13F Filers Only
Search SEC Filer
Search Stocks Only
Search Mgmt Inv. Cos Only
ETFs Only
Search Active




















                      QVT FUND V LP
                    

•   GRAND CAYMAN, E9
                      
How do I update this listing?




                                             QVT Fund V is based out of Grand Cayman.   
                                           














Summary
13D/G
Insider (Form 4)



   Create Email Alert
 




×
Email Notification.







                   ***Log In or
                   Sign-up
                   to see more advanced email alert options such as selecting any type of
                   SEC form, multiple filers or classes of filers, and much more.***
                 

                    ...or to simply have an email sent to you whenever we receive a new
                           13F filing from QVT FUND V LP, enter your
                    email address below and choose 'Submit'.
                

Your email:








Cancel














Contact Info




qvt fund v lp


87 MARY STREET

GRAND CAYMAN
E9
                                                        
                                                    KY1-9005


                                                      Business Phone:
                                                      2127056229







Recent SEC Filings




3 filed on 10/26/2016
3 filed on 07/13/2016
3 filed on 07/13/2016
3 filed on 06/10/2015
3 filed on 03/16/2015
4 filed on 01/13/2015
4 filed on 02/21/2014
3 filed on 02/14/2014
4 filed on 10/02/2013
4 filed on 08/12/2013
















Schedule 13D and 13G events since 03/31/2017

Subscription required



 
Form 4 - Non-derivative Insider Transactions Since 03/31/2017
Loading...








Elevate your investments
Try it for free


















QVT Financial LP - Financial Diligence Networks






























☰



s 






0

    B
  


Notifications


You do not have any new notifications





0

    3
  


Connections


Loading...


See All




0

    5
  


Messages
Jcompose


Loading...


See All







Anonymous User






Anonymous User




⚙Settings
 


?Help
 


LSign out
 



⚙

Settings



L 
Sign out











 


QVT Financial LP
 









Documents




QVT Financial LP



Sign in to access tags

Asset Manager
Founded in Hidden

dHidden
gHidden
oHidden


Headcount: Hidden

Assets Under Management:
Hidden






Headquarters





Point of Contact













QVT Financial LP's Posts
Sign in to see all of QVT Financial LP's posts and to be notified of new updates.
Sign in

 
Form SC 13G/A VIVUS INC Filed by: QVT Financial LP


      * The remainder of this cover page shall be filled out for a reporting person’s initial filing on this form with respect to the subject class of securities, and for any subsequent amendment containing information which would alter the disclosures ...
    

      Read More >
 StreetInsider
February 11, 2015



 Report
 
Report inappropriate or irrelevant content





Aehr Test Systems : Completes Convertible Debt Financing With Strategic Investor


      today announced it has completed a convertible debt financing with strategic investor QVT Financial LP consisting of a $4.1 million convertible note and a $2 million line of credit. Gayn Erickson, President and CEO of Aehr Test Systems, said, 'As we have ...
    

      Read More >
 4 Traders
April 21, 2015



 Report
 
Report inappropriate or irrelevant content





Aehr Test Systems Completes Convertible Debt Financing With Strategic Investor


      April 13, 2015 (GLOBE NEWSWIRE) -- Aehr Test Systems (Nasdaq:AEHR), a worldwide supplier of semiconductor test and burn-in equipment, today announced it has completed a convertible debt financing with strategic investor QVT Financial LP consisting of a $4 ...
    

      Read More >
 Stockhouse
April 13, 2015



 Report
 
Report inappropriate or irrelevant content





IDG Ventures elevates five in Indian VC team


      Before joining the VC firm, Mohla was associated with QVT Financial LP as investment professional. At IDG he is engaged in striking deals with mobile and internet companies. Karan holds a bachelor’s degree in Business Administration (BBA) from the Ross ...
    

      Read More >
 VC Circle
April 17, 2015



 Report
 
Report inappropriate or irrelevant content





Aehr Test Systems Completes Convertible Debt Financing With Strategic Investor


      Aehr Test Systems (AEHR), a worldwide supplier of semiconductor test and burn-in equipment, today announced it has completed a convertible debt financing with strategic investor QVT Financial LP consisting of a $4.1 million convertible note and a $2 ...
    

      Read More >
 Yahoo Finance
April 13, 2015



 Report
 
Report inappropriate or irrelevant content





Aehr Test Systems Completes Convertible Debt Financing With Strategic Investor


      April 13, 2015 (GLOBE NEWSWIRE) -- Aehr Test Systems (Nasdaq:AEHR), a worldwide supplier of semiconductor test and burn-in equipment, today announced it has completed a convertible debt financing with strategic investor QVT Financial LP consisting of a $4 ...
    

      Read More >
 GlobeNewswire
April 13, 2015



 Report
 
Report inappropriate or irrelevant content





Aehr Test Systems Completes Convertible Debt Financing With Strategic Investor


      Aehr Test Systems (NASDAQ:AEHR) , a worldwide supplier of semiconductor test and burn-in equipment, today announced it has completed a convertible debt financing with strategic investor QVT Financial LP consisting of a $4.1 million convertible note and a $ ...
    

      Read More >
 Market Watch
April 13, 2015



 Report
 
Report inappropriate or irrelevant content





Form SC 13G/A CYTRX CORP Filed by: QVT Financial LP


      * The remainder of this cover page shall be filled out for a reporting person’s initial filing on this form with respect to the subject class of securities, and for any subsequent amendment containing information which would alter the disclosures ...
    

      Read More >
 StreetInsider
February 11, 2015



 Report
 
Report inappropriate or irrelevant content





Court Testimony From Litvak Case: Lying Is All In A Day’s Work


      Court testimony describes lying as part of mortgage-backed securities sales process In court testimony, the interaction with Litvak and Joel Wollman, a portfolio manager with QVT Financial LP, appears most interesting. When discussing how the mortgage ...
    

      Read More >
 Value Walk
February 25, 2014



 Report
 
Report inappropriate or irrelevant content





REGENXBIO Secures $70.5 Million in a Mezzanine Financing


      Additional investors participating in the financing include a fund managed by Janus Capital Management LLC; Jennison Associates LLC on behalf of clients; Perceptive Advisors, LLC; QVT Financial LP; Tourbillon Global Ventures; Sectoral Asset Management ...
    

      Read More >
 GlobeNewswire
May 20, 2015



 Report
 
Report inappropriate or irrelevant content





AWILCO DRILLING : AWDR) - DISCLOSURE OF SHAREHOLDINGS


      On 21 May 2015, funds managed by QVT Financial LP ("QVT") sold an aggregate 1,000,000 shares in Awilco Drilling Plc at a price of NOK 50 per share. For further information, please contact Meg Eisner at QVT Financial LP at +1 (212) 705-6229. Click here for ...
    

      Read More >
 4 Traders
May 22, 2015



 Report
 
Report inappropriate or irrelevant content





Cooley, Latham Assist in Axovant IPO


      Axovant is a young company. CEO Ramaswamy left his former job as a manager at the hedge fund QVT Financial LP and founded a separate company called Roivant Sciences in May 2014. Ramaswamy launched Axovant as a subsidiary to Roivant but spun it off in October.
    

      Read More >
 therecorder.com
June 15, 2015



 Report
 
Report inappropriate or irrelevant content





Molycorp Files For Chapter 11


      Molycorp has obtained commitments from a group of its 10% senior secured noteholders, led by JHL Capital Group, JMB Capital Partners and QVT Financial LP, for up to $225 million in gross proceeds of debtor-in-possession (DIP) financing, subject to court ...
    

      Read More >
 Bodyshop
June 29, 2015



 Report
 
Report inappropriate or irrelevant content





Molycorp strikes restructuring deal with creditors


      The restructuring support agreement also provides new financing of up to US$225 million from a group of Molycorp’s creditors led by JHL Capital Group, JMB Capital Partners and QVT Financial LP. The debtor-in-possession financing will support the company ...
    

      Read More >
 The Northern Miner
June 25, 2015



 Report
 
Report inappropriate or irrelevant content





Molycorp Files For Chapter 11 Bankruptcy, Inks Restructuring Deal With Creditors


      The DIP commitment has been obtained from a group of its 10% senior secured noteholders, led by JHL Capital Group, JMB Capital Partners and QVT Financial LP. As part of the filings, the company filed a restructuring plan term sheet that broadly outlines ...
    

      Read More >
 New Ratings
June 25, 2015



 Report
 
Report inappropriate or irrelevant content





Axovant Sciences' IPO Sparks Comment On 'Biotech Bubble'


      Axovant Sciences Ltd (NYSE: AXON) nearly doubled during its first ... was a member of the investment team at hedge fund sponsor QVT Financial LP, with a $1.8 billion portfolio. Axovant hopes to launch a Phase III study of its prospective Alzheimer's ...
    

      Read More >
 Benzinga
June 12, 2015



 Report
 
Report inappropriate or irrelevant content





Molycorp, Inc. Signs Restructuring Support Agreement With Key Creditors; Agreement Covers More Than 70% Of 10% Secured Noteholders


      Molycorp has obtained commitments from a group of its 10% senior secured noteholders, led by JHL Capital Group, JMB Capital Partners and QVT Financial LP, for up to $225 million in gross proceeds of debtor-in-possession (DIP) financing, subject to Court ...
    

      Read More >
 The Street
June 25, 2015



 Report
 
Report inappropriate or irrelevant content





Molycorp reaches restructuring deal with senior noteholders


      Loizides of Loizides PA are counsel to DIP agent Wilmington Trust NA. Joshua K. Brody and Yekaterina Chernyak of Kramer Levin Naftalis & Frankel LLP and Laura Davis Jones of Pachulski Stang Ziehl & Jones LLP represent the DIP lenders. Sam Khalil and Dennis ...
    

      Read More >
 The Deal Pipeline
June 25, 2015



 Report
 
Report inappropriate or irrelevant content





Molycorp, Inc. signs restructuring support agreement with key creditors


      Molycorp has obtained commitments from a group of its 10% senior secured noteholders, led by JHL Capital Group, JMB Capital Partners and QVT Financial LP, for up to $225 million in gross proceeds of debtor-in-possession (DIP) financing, subject to Court ...
    

      Read More >
 Mining
June 25, 2015



 Report
 
Report inappropriate or irrelevant content





Company Overview of QVT Financial LP


      QVT Financial LP is a privately owned hedge fund sponsor. The firm provides its services to pooled investment vehicles. It invests in the public equity and debt markets across the globe. The firm also invests in alternative investment markets across the globe.
    

      Read More >
 Bloomberg
February 26, 2015



 Report
 
Report inappropriate or irrelevant content





Q&A: Awilco Drilling Lost More Than 30%, What To Do Next?


      and QVT Financial LP. However, after the trade, both companies still represent 53 percent of the registered share capital and are inclined to remain long-term industrial owners of Awilco Drilling. And last but not least, there might be some concern about ...
    

      Read More >
 Seeking Alpha
September 16, 2014



 Report
 
Report inappropriate or irrelevant content





Medigene AG : Notification § 27a


      On 10 July 2015, QVT Financial LP informed us in accordance with Section 27a, para.1, sentence 1 and 3 German Securities Trading Act (Wertpapierhandelsgesetz - WpHG), that QVT Financial LP has exceeded a 10% holding threshold in Medigene AG. QVT Financial ...
    

      Read More >
 Finanzen
July 15, 2015



 Report
 
Report inappropriate or irrelevant content





Medigene AG: Notification § 27a


      Medigene AG / Medigene AG: Notification § 27a . Processed and transmitted by NASDAQ OMX Corporate ... DE000A1X3W00 / ISIN DE000A161NA3 On 10 July 2015, QVT Financial LP informed us in accordance with Section 27a, para.1, sentence 1 and 3 German Securities ...
    

      Read More >
 Finanznachrichten
July 15, 2015



 Report
 
Report inappropriate or irrelevant content





Cosy relationship with companies to end


      Drug maker Wockhardt Ltd learnt it the hard way when a group of foreign currency convertible bond holders, led by Singapore-based hedge fund QVT Financial LP, dragged it to court after it defaulted on redemption of $110 million of bonds in October 2009.
    

      Read More >
 Live Mint
January 18, 2015



 Report
 
Report inappropriate or irrelevant content





QVT FINANCIAL LP


      Enter up to 25 symbols separated by commas or spaces in the text box below. These symbols will be available during your session for use on applicable pages. Please note that once you make your selection, it will apply to all future visits to NASDAQ.com.
    

      Read More >
 NASDAQ
December 30, 2014



 Report
 
Report inappropriate or irrelevant content





Key Executives for QVT Financial LP


      To contact QVT Financial LP, please visit . Company data is provided by Capital IQ. Please use this form to report any data issues.
    

      Read More >
 Bloomberg
July 31, 2015



 Report
 
Report inappropriate or irrelevant content





Molycorp enters voluntary Chapter 11 bankruptcy protection


      The commitments come from a group of about 70% of Molycorp's 10% senior secured noteholders – led by JHL Capital Group, JMB Capital Partners and QVT Financial LP – for up to $225 million in...
    

      Read More >
 Metal Bulletin
June 25, 2015



 Report
 
Report inappropriate or irrelevant content





Team up with Siemens and Sony, Aleees Commits to Construct the No.1 E-Bus


      KPCB Fund, QVT Financial LP. The concept of “Human Safe and Eco Friendly” Aleees Group upheld is to build a cradle to cradle green economical system for posterity and for a sustainable environment. Photos/Multimedia Gallery Available: http ...
    

      Read More >
 Yahoo Finance
September  3, 2014



 Report
 
Report inappropriate or irrelevant content





Aehr Test Systems Completes Debt Financing With QVT Financial


      Aehr Test Systems, a worldwide supplier of semiconductor test and burn-in equipment, has completed a convertible debt financing with strategic investor QVT Financial LP consisting of a $4.1 million convertible note and a $2 million line of credit.
    

      Read More >
 abladvisor.com
April 13, 2015



 Report
 
Report inappropriate or irrelevant content





VISTIN PHARMA ASA : VISTIN) - DISCLOSURE OF SHAREHOLDINGS


      On 24 August 2015, the funds under management of QVT Financial LP purchased 978,015 shares in Vistin Pharma ASA, and accordingly, the funds under management of QVT Financial LP, in the aggregate, crossed over the 10% threshold. The funds managed by QVT ...
    

      Read More >
 4 Traders
August 25, 2015



 Report
 
Report inappropriate or irrelevant content





Form SC 13D TEKMIRA PHARMACEUTICALS Filed by: QVT Financial LP


      If the filing person has previously filed a statement on Schedule 13G to report the acquisition that is the subject of this Schedule 13D, and is filing this schedule because of §§240.13d-l(e), 240.13d-l(f) or 240.13d-1(g), check the following box.
    

      Read More >
 StreetInsider
March 16, 2015



 Report
 
Report inappropriate or irrelevant content





Tracy Fu


      Ms. Tracy Fu is a Managing Partner at QVT Financial LP. To contact QVT Financial LP, please visit . Company data is provided by Capital IQ. Please use this form to report any data issues.
    

      Read More >
 Bloomberg
September 23, 2015



 Report
 
Report inappropriate or irrelevant content





Ocera Therapeutics raises $28M in a private placement


      Great Point Partners LLC, funds managed by QVT Financial LP, RA Capital Management, InterWest Partners and Three Arch Opportunity Fund. Finance Investment & Company Information common stock
    

      Read More >
 Yahoo Finance
November  6, 2013



 Report
 
Report inappropriate or irrelevant content





Medigene AG : Notification § 27a


      On 10 July 2015, QVT Financial LP informed us in accordance with Section 27a, para.1, sentence 1 and 3 German Securities Trading Act (Wertpapierhandelsgesetz - WpHG), that QVT Financial LP has exceeded a 10% holding threshold in Medigene AG. QVT Financial ...
    

      Read More >
 GlobeNewswire
July 15, 2015



 Report
 
Report inappropriate or irrelevant content





Palatin Technologies Completes $30 Million Financing


      Certain funds managed by QVT Financial LP invested $5 million and another accredited investment fund invested $15 million. The funds paid $0.90 for each Series E warrant and $0.125 for each Series F warrant, resulting in gross proceeds to Palatin of $20 ...
    

      Read More >
 Market Watch
July  6, 2015



 Report
 
Report inappropriate or irrelevant content





Icagen sale means millions for Merlin Nexus, QVT Financial, Venrock Associates


      The biggest financial beneficiaries from Pfizer Inc.’s acquisition of Icagen Pharmaceuticals will include Merlin Nexus, QVT Financial LP and Venrock Associates, according to the latest stock holding information available on FactSet Research Systems Inc ...
    

      Read More >
 The Business Journal
July 21, 2011



 Report
 
Report inappropriate or irrelevant content





VISTIN PHARMA ASA : VISTIN) - DISCLOSURE OF SHAREHOLDINGS


      On 28 October 2015, the funds under management of QVT Financial LP purchased 183,670 shares in Vistin Pharma ASA, and accordingly, the funds under management of QVT Financial LP, in the aggregate, crossed over the 15% threshold. The funds managed by QVT ...
    

      Read More >
 4 Traders
October 29, 2015



 Report
 
Report inappropriate or irrelevant content





Axovant Sciences Has Biggest Ever Biotech IPO, Shares Double


      A graduate of Harvard College with an A.B. in biology and the recipient of a law degree from Yale Law School, Ramaswamy is a former partner at investment firm QVT Financial LP, board chairman at Tekmira Pharmaceuticals, and founder and president of Campus ...
    

      Read More >
 India West
June 17, 2015



 Report
 
Report inappropriate or irrelevant content





Palatin Secures $10MM Loan From Horizon Technology Finance


      Funds under the management of QVT Financial LP invested $10 million and another accredited investment fund also invested $10 million. The funds paid $0.75 for each share of common stock and $0.74 for each Series C warrant, resulting in gross proceeds to ...
    

      Read More >
 abladvisor.com
December 29, 2014



 Report
 
Report inappropriate or irrelevant content





SPECTRUM ASA : SPU) - DISCLOSURE OF SHAREHOLDINGS


      On 17 December 2014, the funds under management of QVT Financial LP sold 2,400,000 shares in Spectrum ASA, and accordingly, the funds under management of QVT Financial LP, in the aggregate, crossed below the 5% threshold. The funds managed by QVT Financial ...
    

      Read More >
 4 Traders
December 18, 2014



 Report
 
Report inappropriate or irrelevant content





Tenet Healthcare Corp (THC), YPF SA (ADR) (YPF), eBay Inc (EBAY): Top 3 Holdings of Qvt Financial LP


      Qvt Financial LP is a privately owned hedge fund that invests in equity, debt markets, the public equity and debt markets globally. The firm creates its portfolios by investing in structured finance, high yield distressed debts, and private placements.
    

      Read More >
 stockwisedaily.com
December  2, 2014



 Report
 
Report inappropriate or irrelevant content





QVT Financial LP 3Q 13F: Largest Sales


      DJ CFA SOURCE: SEC 13F-HR FILER: QVT Financial LP QUARTER ENDED: 09/30/2013 SEC RECEIVED: 11/14/2013 Up to 200 of the largest sales of QVT Financial LP are listed below, ordered by the number of shares sold during the three months ended Sep. 30. Company ...
    

      Read More >
 4 Traders
November 15, 2013



 Report
 
Report inappropriate or irrelevant content





QVT Financial LP - Rule 8.3- ACP Capital Ltd


      Reuters is not responsible for the content in this press release. RNS Number:1230K QVT Financial LP 17 December 2007 FORM 8.3 DEALINGS BY PERSONS WITH INTERESTS IN SECURITIES REPRESENTING 1% OR MORE (Rule 8.3 of the Takeover Code) 1. KEY INFORMATION Name ...
    

      Read More >
 Reuters
December 18, 2007



 Report
 
Report inappropriate or irrelevant content





Team up with Siemens and Sony, Aleees Commits to Construct the No.1 E-Bus


      KPCB Fund, QVT Financial LP. The concept of “Human Safe and Eco Friendly” Aleees Group upheld is to build a cradle to cradle green economical system for posterity and for a sustainable environment.
    

      Read More >
 Business Wire
September  3, 2014



 Report
 
Report inappropriate or irrelevant content





Cosy relationship with companies to end


      Drug maker Wockhardt Ltd learnt it the hard way when a group of foreign currency convertible bond holders, led by Singapore-based hedge fund QVT Financial LP, dragged it to court after it defaulted on redemption of $110 million of bonds in October 2009.
    

      Read More >
 Live Mint & Wall Street Journal
January 18, 2015



 Report
 
Report inappropriate or irrelevant content





Aleees, Sony to build electric buses in Taiwan


      KPCB Fund, QVT Financial LP. Focusing on electric buses and LFP cathode material manufacturing, Aleees operated on the concept of “Human Safe and Eco-friendly” to create green technologies for posterity and a sustainable environment. – EcoSeed Staff
    

      Read More >
 Eco Seed
September  6, 2014



 Report
 
Report inappropriate or irrelevant content





Hedge fund sponsor QVT Financial raises Gemfields stake to 7.87 pct


      Gemstone producer and explorer Gemfields PLC (AIM: GEM) said it was notified by New York based hedge fund sponsors QVT Financial LP that it bought approximately 8.2m shares in the group via shareholdings of QVT Fund LP, Quintessence Fund LP and Deutsche ...
    

      Read More >
 Proactive Investors UK
September 24, 2009



 Report
 
Report inappropriate or irrelevant content





QVT Financial Pleased with VIVUS (VVUS) Settlement; Changes Filing to 13G


      QVT previously filed an amended 13D on May 20th with the same number of shares. In the current filing, the firm made the following statement: QVT Financial LP, QVT Financial GP LLC, QVT Associates GP LLC, and QVT Fund V LP previously filed a Schedule 13D ...
    

      Read More >
 StreetInsider
July 19, 2013



 Report
 
Report inappropriate or irrelevant content





These 10 Hedge Fund Are Probably Really, Really Happy They Invested In Vivus


      QVT Financial LP: ~8.53 million shares (9.59%) 3. OrbiMed Advisors: ~6.16 million shares (6.94%) 4. Caxton Associates: ~5.25 million shares (5.91%) 5. Suttonbrook Capital: ~5.05 million shares (5.68%) 6. Passport Capital: ~4.29 million shares (4.83%)
    

      Read More >
 The Business Insider
February 23, 2012



 Report
 
Report inappropriate or irrelevant content





Tengion raises cash to stay alive


      Among the company's existing creditors providing new debt are RA Capital Management and Deerfield Management, and new note-holders include Perceptive Life Sciences and QVT Financial LP. Also, Celgene Corp. (NASDAQ: CELG), which invested $5 million in ...
    

      Read More >
 The Business Journal
July  1, 2013



 Report
 
Report inappropriate or irrelevant content





Tekmira Announces Completion of the Merger With OnCore Creating a Leading Hepatitis B Solutions Company


      Mr. Richard Henriques is the former CFO for the Bill & Melinda Gates Foundation, and previously served in executive roles at Merck & Co. Dr. Keith Manchester serves as Managing Director and Head of Life Sciences for QVT Financial LP. Mr. Frank Karbe is the ...
    

      Read More >
 Yahoo Finance
March  5, 2015



 Report
 
Report inappropriate or irrelevant content





Directors' Dealings and Directorate Change


      Directors' dealing and notification of changes to significant shareholders QVT Financial LP, a company in which Mr. Strong was until recently a senior investment professional, sold 91,554,086 ordinary shares of €0.01 each ("Ordinary Shares") in the ...
    

      Read More >
 FE Trustnet
March  6, 2015



 Report
 
Report inappropriate or irrelevant content




No news for QVT Financial LP right now. Check back soon!


            Powered by 



QVT Financial LP's Important Information
Sign in to see all of QVT Financial LP's info like historical assets, fund info, performance, terms, and other important info normally found in a DDQ.
Sign in


QVT Financial LP's Employees
Sign in to see all of QVT Financial LP's important employee info, such as senior management's bios' education, and responsibilities.
Sign in


QVT Financial LP's Offices
Sign in to see all of QVT Financial LP's offices.
Sign in







★Follow✓Following☆Unfollow

More Actions
GSave as PDF
CPrint
















Loading...


Loading...






